helping me buy cute running gear
With EMPTY, I wanted to continue exposing the effects of bullying. I wanted readers to feel Dell's pain. Emotional pain from bullying is real and potent and not easily forgotten. Humiliation weaves its way around hearts and souls, darkening, shading them from the bright light of happiness.
This is no easy task.
Ink: Memento
The best-laid schemes o' mice an' men
But knowledge, talent, allegiance, and a dose of mystic wisdom are not ALL that this man has to offer. Although he now resides in Korea, Steven spent most of his life in Alabama, and resultingly possesses a large library of underground music from that particular region -- "Southern punk rock and metal that doesn't sound like Alabama Thunderpussy", as he himself so eloquently put it. While he has repeatedly refused my offers of full-time work here at IC, today we are lucky enough to have Steven by for a quick post, at least, showcasing the highlights of said library. Dig in.
Today was officially a Pajama Day in the Hopper household. It all started off very unintentionally. You get up, eat breakfast, start a task, check your email then before you know it, it is 2:27 pm. You eat lunch. At this point you are not leaving the house, so why not continue on in your pajamas? For about a half hour I was feeling really cranky that I never showered or got out of my sweatpants. I loathed my lack of accomplishment but finally surrendered to the fact that today was just one of those days and I should enjoy it. For tomorrow, we work!
The album is rife with psychedelic guitar licks and vocals – in fact, many of the vocals are dual-harmonized in an MGMT circa Oracular Spectacular fashion. Seemingly random sounds play a large role throughout the album – tribal drum beats blend seamlessly with crescendoing feedback and dive-bombing guitars. This cacophonous blend of traditional and nontraditional, random and expected, gives the listener a truly psychedelic listening experience. Preteen Zenith embraces the notion of psychedelia as a concept, not just a guitar running through a fuzz-inducing effects pedal.
i heart you, dee!
So last Friday afternoon we flew to Orange County. With Granny in tow, we spent Saturday at Disneyland, Sunday at Legoland, and then W.B. and I returned home on Monday.
Voting is open until Friday 12:00 pm.
Philadelphia is known for its food culture. It created the cheesesteak (Note: this blog takes a firm non-partisan stance on Pat’s Steaks vs. Geno’s Steaks), the hoagie, and of course, Tastykake.
“Well when I’m on stage, I like to think that there’s a beautiful open dialogue between me and the audience.” Muz says. “As comfortable as people think I am on stage, naked, I am like any other performer, riddled with insecurities. I need to be loved by at least two hundred people a night, otherwise I feel valueless.”
Far too many women beat themselves up when they can’t stick to their diets.
Once my “havruta”(scare quotes because he is a Rav more than a havruta), was on the phone with a young Rosh Yeshiva’s son, who had be redt his daughter. The young man made the mistake of asking why he should consider his daughter over all the other prospects he had. My havruta’s response was, “Each and every one is a Bat Yisrael, and thus you should count yourself fortunate if any of them will have you.” Then he hung up. His net phone call was to the Shaddchan, wanting to know if there wasn’t a B”T or Ger that his daughter could date(the Shaddchan was apparently horrified). So they sent their daughter to America where her father isn’t so well known… but I digress.
But Highland's principal said the community, and the city, can assist.
2. approx. 5-10% RTs - retweet helpful writerly information tweeted by group above in #1.
Round 2 saw some action on the Jets part. Traded up to select Stephen Hill at 43, WR from Georgia Tech. Funny, he was invited to Radio City but not picked until day 2. Go figure.
Introduction to the Programme
You don’t always make a name for yourself with your debut effort. This record barely made a ripple when it came out in October ’64, but when “Sounds of Silence” hit #1 on New Year’s Day 1966, everything changed.
The boy first realises his own mortality when he’s five and witnesses a child-sized casket being carried from the mortuary his family then lived over and this morbid preoccupation stays with him for several years. Later he learns about a boy who is killed in a car accident which both his parents survive. And a little while after this one of three daughters, a girl of about eight dies. He never sees her die – she dies of pneumonia – but the boy witnesses loss through the disappearance of toys from once-littered lawns and porches:
I say all this because it’s good that he and his sister are far from couch potatoes. They get out and do things (i.e. Reid to India/backpacking; it’s a piece of cake for Ellento assume the ‘Down Dog’ position and whatever other tortuous yoga contortions are called).
It’s so simple, yet one when I first heard it, wiped away all the excuses I used to make about why I couldn’t find time to write. Here it is:
What I did ......
Another recent chocolate beer was had at the Reno's...In Lansing, Michigan. I did not know I had been in there before, until I stepped in and had a flashdate of a Horrible Date I had there in 2003. I think it lasted 90 minutes total. Too bad because Reno's is a cool enough spot. Luckily the company was much better this time around. :) Shuffleboard, games, and a decent beer list. They were featuring Michigan's Arcadia Ales, a brewery specializing in British-style ales. I had Arcadia's Cocoa Loco, a "triple-chocolate milk stout." It was nice. Very dark brown with a small light-brown head. Smelled very roasty with coffee and sweet chocolate. Tasted the same - basically a mocha beer. Distinct coffee, chocolate, some lingering bitterness, and a little bit of noticeable alcohol. At 7% ABV it's a big beer, but still subtle. Not overly boozey, sweet, or chocolatey. It's got some class. This is a pleasant milk stout. A-
Saving time is a big attraction for clients. Take physiotherapist Urvi Shelar, who often finds herself with little time to go luxury shopping. “When you’re spending a considerable amount on a designer item, you don’t want to hurry it,” she says. This is where the store Dressing Room comes to her rescue. Often it’s the owner, Chirag Dattani, who drops by at her place to take her through the selected options. He also gives her style tips. “The system works well for me. I have shopped for occasion wear from The Dressing Room after home trials,” says Shelar.
project is officially (and legally) launched.
Thirdly there is the addiction to spin. The belief that seems widely held by those in power that words speak louder than actions, that the rhetoric of the light on the hill is more important than the approach that it would suggest. We grow tired to the media circus that surrounds everything, and of a media that thinks or rather does not think for itself, and the general notion that we can fix everything with an announcement. Announcements fix nothing. Announcing the same thing four times still does not fix it. It is like the margin note on the sermon ‘louder – argument weak here’.
Moving on, I have stuff to do now (including but not limited to sorting old toys into different categories. It's important.) so I'm gonna go. I hope you all hate me less after this, and I also hope it will last a while, cause I somehow can't imagine myself writing another post any time really soon.
Do you run from conflict?
I won’t ever share with them
Please do not be deceived…Church of Latter Day Saints – Mormons – is in fact a cult, not Christian brothers as our “buddy” (term used loosely) Osteen would like to have everyone believe. The heart of the matter is, Osteen does not wish to offend anyone or drive away a single person from his church that may have deep pockets and therefore, Joel politically dodges the questions in such a way that only an unbeliever or a Lakewood member would be deceived by.
in the works:
NEoN Digital Arts Festival is pleased to announce a call for exhibition submissions for NEoN 2012, which is to be hosted by Hannah Maclure Centre. We are looking for work specifically conceived for NEoN and explore this year’s theme ‘Movement’.
Heh. Can you tell that I am bored? Well here is a list of questions. I will not post my answers on this blog but another different blog. Muahahahaha! To get my answers press here.
Do you miss those seemingly endless “Bloggers vs Mainstream Media” debates that were ubiquitous not that long ago? Then you are probably overjoyed about the “Stats vs Watching The Game” debates that have taken their place.
a car that runs
When that didn't work, I counted one area and multiplied it until I calculated how many it took to build the front. Then I doubled it for the back and again for the sides. I added in a couple thousand to make it an even 10,000. So 10,000 bricks is what we're aiming for :) 10,000 bricks of love and several hundred pounds of mortar of hope and God will have that school built and we'll be ready to get 75-100 more children sponsored for their shot at an awesome education! Oh, and the best part about the bricks is that they are made by the people that live in the village. So your money is staying within the village and that is another reason I chose the title "Buy a Brick, Build up Bugabo" :)
After reading all of these critiques, I think my own position has evolved. I agree that Obama made some mistakes in his interview that need rectifying. The following is what I think Obama should have said…. (my altered version in bold…):
This file association does not have a program associated with if for performing this action. Create an association in the Set Association control panel.
It is a contest again if you feel like voting.
Jon Feinstein / Co-curator, 31 Women in Art Photography, Co-founder and Curatorial Director, Humble Arts Foundation
Whose opinions about your mothering do you value most? Do your actions mostly reflect the answer to that question?
to grab on and hang on for dear life! Amen.
Despite the “animal rights” public image PETA intentionally promotes, however, their underlying philosophy and activities, by and large, are decidedly welfarist and substantially contradict any coherent notion of animal rights.
She also told the presenters that she felt ‘blessed’ for the opportunity and experience she gained and coming so far in the competition saying: “From the beginning I set myself to expect the unexpected. It’s just a blessing me having come this far – it’s just incredible.”
Design: 3/5
Pretty much around three months ago, Mr. Baddie and I moved into our new apartment in the centre of Berlin. It’s a lovely, bright place with an incredible amount of roomy built-in closets (which are mostly filled with my shoes; no, really). It does have some unexpected features, however. Like no visible wires for lamps. Yep, the ceilings are smooth as a baby’s bottom. So when we were unpacking during several winter days when it got dark around 4, we had to do it one room at a time, travelling with our single free standing lamp accordingly. We still have this problem, by the way.
Must be nice, Connor thought enviously. He was no slouch, but rarely dated anyone as hot as the girls who threw themselves at Taylor. And the guy always acted like it was no big deal. Taylor didn’t know how good he had it.
The shooting is completed through the 2 o-clock right the watch, then when using it by your side, just remainder your chin in your hands and picture away. Situation your self so the view is going at what you want to picture and initiate shooting if you are completely ready.
TRUTH: I walked because I’d hate coming home to an empty house. My cousin is definitely going out tonight with her date (whoever that is). So I’m home alone. Again.
The magazine goes out free to BHS members and costs £4.50 otherwise. If you can't make it on the night, I guess you can get them from the Brewery History Society website.
Delftware tile - The Holt Owl
My intent was to share 12 techie days of Christmas with everyone, but after days of indoor recess, I find myself exhausted and falling behind on my blogging intentions. So here is my next great freebie(drum roll please...)
George and Diane are not in a partnership but a carer-caree friendship, yet have been housed together in just one room since their eviction.
There is statutory provision and guidance in existence for local authorities to take into account in exercising their powers in relation to allocation. Under Part VII of the Housing Act 1996, as amended by the Homelessness Act 2002, local authorities may have a duty to accommodate victims of domestic or other violence, who are eligible for assistance, because the violence they have suffered or are suffering makes it unreasonable for them to continue to occupy their current accommodation.
The wargamer's butterfly effect strikes again!
Today I decided to bust out my old Fujifilm FinePix J10 point and shoot camera. Its got a few features but none of them are really conducive to street photography. It offers a manual mode that will allow u to adjust ISO and white balance. The bad part is you don’t have access to the Anti-Blur so almost every shot will come out with some funky motion blur. The other mode is actually called Anti-Blur and all it really offers is the Anti-Blur. Everything else is automatically adjusted. Shutter speed isnt adjustable and it’s actually a bit slow so thinking ahead is important. The camera also has a small built-in flash that works in TTL mode which is actually really nice. The camera also offers a really good Macro mode that has given me some really good photos in the past. It’s also really compact and literally disappears in my hand while I hold it. It’s a great little camera for just snapping some shots when u don’t really care or don’t wanna think too much.
Legal Reference Material
But back to bad advice. The worst advice is unsolicited advice. Seriously. And if you really have to give it, you should probably avoid swearing at the person. I personally love a good swear, but some people are pissy about that kind of thing.
Alrightythen, got that off my chest....
We’ve finished with Winter and its vagaries, its
What are you going to put in your bio?
Hopefully something can be sorted asap.
Even Adwoa's pictures from Retro Tech Geneva were used by a known fashion designer as a pattern to a dress, what has thrown typewriters to the runways and the fashion world.
Nicknames are also a way of branding ourselves. This is a generation obsessed with marketing, as we’ve had commercials speaking and singing to us since we were babies. Who is better an example of self-promotion and marketing than Sean Combs, the rapper, producer, “singer” and ”actor,” but most of all, businessman and promoter. Combs claims he was originally nicknamed “Puff” because he would huff and puff when he was really upset as a kid. Combs has tried on different nicknames from “Puff Daddy” to Puffy to P. Diddy to Diddy as he’s reinvented himself throughout his career again and again.
Obama has deliberately turned his back, and walked on by.
Joerg Haider was the the former Leader of the Austrian Freedom Party until he left to become Leader of the Alliance for Austria's Future that both recently done so well in the Austrian elections.
Race issue" meant arguing about who ran the fastest.
our feet: we trust Thou hast bathed us once for all in the sin-removing
you have to look at this as some kind of spiritual conspiracy against you
Back in the office, I tried the trick with the orange juice, but
for recent interviews, I have started to think about the activities surrounding the actual interview. The way I communicate, not the fact that it is by email, but the nature of the language used to discuss mundane things such as where we should meet, how we come to a decision and how we greet each other. On the whole, I am interviewing people I know and sometimes bump into in Birmingham. Occasionally, they pick up on a point we had discussed during the interview and start to elaborate on it – clearly having had the opportunity to reflect. What does this reveal and is it significant? We characterize the creative industries as being highly networked and relatively informal – is this reflected in my approach and my relationship to the sample? I am working with people I know.
Interesting question. When you become a public figure, your life seems to become a part of public record. But, should we really be able to know every single detail of what Casey Anthony does and has done? About what her family does and has done?
Ever entered nanowrimo? :D It's never too late to start! I'm a bit behind the 1666 words a day goal and have 2220 but haven't written today yet. I do most of my writing at the end of the month and during Thanksgiving break, typically. One year I barely had 10,000 words by week four and wrote the last 40k at the pace of just under 10k a day! Crazy stuff. Maybe it's because I need the rest of the month to really get a feeling in my mind of how I want the book to be. I keep writing snippets of things that I keep in a notepad file and on paper for later in the book that I can't use yet! If I counted all that, I'd probably be at about 4 to 5k at the moment. I find it easiest for smaller novels like these to work out the ending of it first so I know whatever I write just has to get the characters to that point.
Mike Kenna - - No for hockey, maybe for afterparty
I’m turning in for the night. Tuesday promises to be an interesting day and I plan to spend it at home.
OK, I know what you're thinking. You've seen my picture and you'd like to beg to differ. But that's just in people years, not in writer years.
So onto our challenge!! The theme this month is to use 2 stamps as the background and also to follow this sketch.
And speaking of art and festivities....Ya'll know I adhere to the 12 Days of Christmas right? Well, most of the celebrations are over but the one last biggy is coming up; 12th Night! or Epiphany. Traditionally it is a night for partying and eating and such but I live out in the boonies and it falls on a Thursday this year, so....I am going to have a 12th Night Party here, on the blog. Now, usually you would bake a King's Cake or similar and inside the cake is a coin or bean. Whoever gets the coin or token in their slice is crowned "king" and is supposed to have good luck that year. There are many variations to this depending on your denomination or heritage. Anyway, you all come by here Thursday and leave a comment. I will bake something that can be divided up. I thought about cupcakes but Jack and I have eaten so many sweets and such I may use something else. Now, whatever it is, it will have a coin inside and I will put a little flag on each section for every person that leaves a comment. Maybe I'm explaining this right. Anyway, as we eat whatever this is, we will come across the coin and if your name is on the corresponding flag, you win one of my mugs! and the coin! Some of you may be more excited about the coin I know, but anyway, I thought it would be fun! And who knows, there might be some other goody thrown in.
Today's LGPS (Local Government Pension Scheme) "Protect Our Pensions" Bulletin 16 from the UNISON Centre reveals the following;
These were my very first interviews so it was very exciting and I look forward to what is next.
I will wish for you,
I don’t feel like I’ve made the wrong decision so that’s something right?
So I am calling it the race to 20! It isn't about the money, or bragging rights. It is a race to drink beer again. I worked out twice today. Yes, 2 times! And I'm going to do it again tomorrow, and the next day, and the day after that, and then continue down that long and sober road until I get a phone call, or until that scale tells me I win.
Selectors:
My brain also failed to shake the frantic-epic-panic-attack that Greg's death had caused. I was wide awake, I knew I had just had a dream about Greg's death, but I COULD NOT figure out where the dream ended and real life began. That made the panic attack worse.
I was unable to think straight. How was that possible? Damon said that Zeph was on the right… but that was me… I was Zeph? Zeph… My head hurt. The pain was unbearable. Images flashed before my eyes. Images of the woman on the left. Memories I didn’t had before or didn’t remember. Memories of another person… someone I know so well of… And I saw it. I saw myself covered in blood. I had a knife, a knife in my hands. No, it wasn’t me. Rose. Rose was covered in blood. She had a knife in her hands. Stabbing herself in front of me. Rose, my Rose. She was dead. Dead. And I realized I was back into reality.
Each mission also has a fountain in the front or in the courtyard. If there is water in it, you will want to use a polarizer to decrease the glare. If you do not have a polarizer, try to position yourself so that you do not have a bright spot in the water. Many of the fountains have lilly pads and flowers. These are also good for close-up shots. If there is no water, I try to get down low and make a bigger landscape shot. There are many options in the courtyards. We have seen fountains, gardens, graveyards, crosses, bells, and other subjects. Make sure to make big and small shots.
Keenan Tracey ... Logan Buchanan
Today is Sunday and we have new travel photos posted at Viva la Voyage. This week we are sharing photos of magical Siem Reap, Cambodia. It is a place we can't wait to go back to.
The placemats and napkins came from my mother. I was with her when she purchased them decades ago. When we were cleaning out her things after she went to be with Jesus, I found these with the tags still on them. I also pulled out the black plates and the white one with the bare branches. Very wintry indeed!
Note: I saved a bit of the ganache to put on the cake just before adding the chopped Reese's PB Cups to act as a glue, making sure everything adhered correctly, then chilled it again to let it set. So basically, frost the cake, then chill, then add a thin layer of ganache again, add the garnish, then chill again.
Skip began a conversation with his father.
“We have made it friend.” Kostya beamed up at his companion.
“We found that 97 per cent of imams, or leaders, were from overseas and 92 per cent were educated abroad, mostly in Pakistan or Bangladesh. Almost all mosques are controlled by first-generation immigrant men, leaving most British Muslims - women and young people - out of the management structure.”
Some of the artists include….
In Free Practice for the Spanish this weekend, Ferrari caused a small technical controversy when they ran a new rear wing. This new wing appeared to have large extension to the rear flap. After the days sessions were complete Charlie Whiting from the FIA spoke to Ferrari about its legality.
How did I manage to stay single until such a late age without getting married, you ask? Well, some friends tell me I'm the luckiest dude living on this planet, but some say I am missing something. "
I made a similar one back in February, but this time I went for the full lego look, with lots and lots of punched circles to simulate the lego board.
It was my first experience of meeting a blogging friend so I did not know how it would be and I can honestly say that I was very pleased to have met up with Suburbia as she is such a lovely person.
Lighter than everything that came before it
Let's check out some from last week's party, shall we??
Maria (who may be the only one reading this blog regularly) talked about believing in 'strong guidance'. I like her way of looking at these things, but I think I'm more laissez faire.
At least 4 million square feet of office buildings are in the planning stages in Brooklyn and Queens, not including Forest City Ratner's Atlantic Yards development.
On The inside I cut out the side to make room for the book and then constructed the cubbyholes with doors. I put my little secret things inside of each door and labeled them with little hand-made tags.
Bloom introduces himself as an expert Iowanologist:For almost 20 years I've lived in Iowa, where as a professor at the University of Iowa I've taught thousands of university students. I've written a couple of books on rural Iowa, traveling to all 99 counties, and have spent much of my time when not teaching, visiting with and interviewing Iowans from across the state.The article is long and well-padded with local trivia. This might create an impression Bloom not only knows Iowa but perhaps even sympathizes with Iowans. It would be a false impression.
According to the production team, Super Junior, SNSD, and TVXQ members introduced themselves one by one and talked about each other. TVXQ’s Yoon Ho introduced himself as “a charismatic, tough member of TVXQ” and said he liked to exercise. At this, Leeteuk got laughs saying, “I think Yoon Ho could be more successful as an athlete.”
My favourite fashion blog! This is where I learn about what is trending, who looked best at the awards, and what not to wear! Natalie has infinite wisdom into the fashion world and takes time and care over her choice of pictures, often making her own unique and beautiful photo collages for the blog.
"Hi, Leauxra."
The attackers, who were drug addicts, simply disappeared into the night. Cillier’s murder, at Christmas, was barely reported in the local press. It was, after all, everyday news.
Based on statements from principal actors involved the incident, police believe that after one of the 16-year-old boys knocked Strucinski to the ground, another 16-year-old boy rifled through his pockets and grabbed his wallet.
The scene above talks about how close the alleged 'superpowers' come to pushing the nuclear button. The very thought of it is obscene, deaths on an unimaginable scale and a poisoned planet, all because two political ideologies can't find compromise. McGoohan's character explains in great detail that accidents don't happen on nuclear subs, that safety is paramount and guaranteed, due to the huge amounts of money paid. All very good all very 1960's Cold War propaganda, particularly as the US Department of Defence objected to earlier drafts of the script.
Now that I've lost all of my saved images and have to start all over - I'm vowing to credit all of the photos you find on the blog that were not taken by me, to either the designer, the photographer, or the original site I found the photos on. This means a lot more work for me, but it ensures that credit is paid all the time, to those who deserve it.
If we follow this advice, maybe my friend and I, the Laker fan prototype and the Celtic fan prototype, will find our own peaceful resolution. Maybe after the initial obstacles have been exorcised, have played themselves into exhaustion, we can retire too, in a sense – and find our own meeting of the minds.
Many people like to drink a Gewürztraminer with spicy food, because it is thought to be slightly spicy itself – personally I do not agree with that, and do not enjoy that combination.
What, exactly does that imply? Salvation is no longer of the Jews. We are not under the Law of Moses but under grace. Jesus Christ died for the sins of all the world regardless of nationality or religion. It implies that Israel failed to be a kingdom of priests and rather than being a channel of blessing have joined the Gentiles in unbelief.
Let rest 10 minutes before serving.
But being the unselfish person I am, I want my students to experience all that life has to offer. It will give them more content about which to write and make them more well rounded people in general.
“Kill me, little sister. Kill me and you kill Jace, too.”
So Ben and I are set to leave the island for London on the 1st August. (Dad found a hire van for £15 / day last year and has been relishing the thought of the move so the bargain can be fulfilled).
A lying tongue,
(One of God’s prophets) to interpret the writing for him.
Turns out that someone I consider a really good friend, this blog’s own Rockstar-Poet-in-Residence, Barbie Dockstader Angell, suffered a setback this week. The specifics aren’t mine to tell, but I think I can say it involved a situation in which Barbie was treated unjustly, & that in a significant way.
Backgrounded by a starless sky, I’ll let that stone roll away.
Pep, you have inspired me beyond words. And I will miss you every weekend, directing and comandeering the best futbol team that has ever existed. Because of course, Barça without Xavi and Iniesta, Puyo and Messi would never be the same. Barcelona without Pep won't be the same, but life continues. The mark of the leader is more noticeable when they're gone. I know Pep's legacy will extend for years, if not ever. I'll certainly remember him always.
No, like most other people, their teens and early twenties were the age when most drink enthusiasts were only dimly aware of spirits. Hard liquor was likely something you knew only from advertisements, your parents' liquor cabinet, or whispered, cautionary tales of how somebody's brother got completely wasted that one time drinking way too much (insert liquor brand here).
Whitney blogs at Whitney Thinks and more frequently at the Mother Daughter Diet Diary. I have a suspicion Whitney happened into the Beer Rant neighborhood strictly by chance. I’ve not seen many comments from her, though she did leave a very kind offer to send Shiner on my son-in-law’s blog and for that, I’m sure she ranks as good beer folk.
all my heroes–
Disaster Avoidance = Saving Throw
Now, six years since we first opened our doors, we are busting at the seams as they say. More children than we can currently accommodate are on a wait list to participate in readings here. It’s time to leave this home behind, find a bigger space, and make our next Pajama Program Reading Center in NYC just as magical, maybe even more so. This has become my true home and it’s tearing me apart to leave, but I know it’s time. It’s time to invite more children in, it’s time to give them a hug, a book, a pair of new, warm pajamas and a chance to see that there’s a beautiful place just for them when they open the door. It’s time.
It is kind of funny how blogging makes me feel
COMBINE half and half or milk, pumpkin, sugar, and pumpkin pie spices in a small saucepan. Heat until very hot, but do not boil. Remove from heat and add vanilla. Transfer to a blender or a milk frother and blend until frothy.
Like the movie Kong's love for Ann Darrow (Fay Wray), Agu had a thing for Lorna.
(b) Find the Fourier transforms of eternal sinusoids
For the filling mix the flour, sugar, and the softened butter in a medium bowl. Add the vanilla extract. Mix the filling until it looks like clumpy, damp sand. It should not take long. Set aside.
I like, but don't need, to be in control. I am a problem-solver. In a small group I am comfortable leading out. I can do that. Not necessarily bossy, but firm and confident enough. I admit that the challenge I like best is charming people into trusting me. Not in a slimy salesperson kind of way, but in a public relations kind of way.
We should have been moved to this prayer against the Turk by the great need of our time, for the Turk, as has been said, is the servant of the devil, who not only ruins land and people with the sword, as we shall hear later, but also lays waste the Christian Faith and our dear Lord Jesus Christ. For although some praise his government because he allows everyone to believe what he will so long as he remains the temporal lord, yet this praise is not true, for he does not allow Christians to come together in public, and no one can openly confess Christ or preach or teach against Mohammed.
45. In one month I will be riding a charter bus to Lansing, Michigan with about 30 kids....Lord please help me!!
Psalm 119 speaks bountifully of the need for The Word of God in our lives for guidance, discipline, and support at the heart or spirit level (notice the words: heart, meditate, rejoice, delight, behold, open my eyes – all of which speak of the effect of the Word at the ‘spirit” level of awareness). Here is just a sample: …
my inspiration is overflowing
I will post updates as they surface and are confirmed.
The weather is expected to stay mostly sunny tomorrow, with a maximum of 23C, and a partly cloudy 25C on Monday. Those attending the Show today will be treated to a shearing and wool-handling competition.
Come to think of it, I almost did.
14 See Me Feel Me (5:16)
Wipe my nose
If you're interested in meeting Bermuda, check out the Almost Home website for information, or call them at (630) 582-3738.
Maybe it’s just a phase, that I will hopefully ride out soon enough.
The shops central locations will harness a rustic retail space, with stone floor, baskets, wooden shelves, chalkboards etc. The ovens will be directly behind the counter delivering a fresh-from the-oven-feel. Some space for grab & go brunch/lunch market goodies in fridges, POS and fresh made coffee to-go. These other products will compliment the rustic & organic ethos within the shops.
When loss comes, there are always things left unsaid, undone. We move through the stages of loss and acceptance, and ultimately realize it wouldn't matter when the loss occurred. We will always have more we wanted to share with those we loved.
This is Double Mountain brewer Matt Swihart's land. Cherries from his orchards go in his annual kriek. (The latest vintage, brewed with last year's cherries, was just released in Hood River.) His crop is about ten days from maturity.
Steve, from Creature Feature, shared how these creatures he brought, knowing that even they know him well (he cares for them as pets), he can do things that will bring them back to their wild nature, and attack when they feel threaten. As pet owners he said, we need to know that.
Not all of their retouching involves photos of women. Indeed, they have an example of a photo elderly man where they made him look easily twenty years younger. However, women are far more common on magazine covers and in ads than men. And all indications are that this company and others like have, as a rule, made these woman look like something they are not.
On first impression it sounded like someone breathing in short, shallow breaths. I was opening my mouth to tell Jane to stop the tape, rewind it, I may have heard something, when I realized the sound was only getting louder. I could tell by the expression on Jane's face that I was not, in fact, hearing things. She was hearing it too. What came next, though, sent shivers down my spine and made the sounds we'd heard in the farmhouse--frightening and inexplicable though they were--seem like nothing more than a precursor. The breaths seemed to be getting louder, and although no sound of movement could be heard, I got the distinct impression that something was drawing nearer to the microphone. It frightened me to the core to think that the very cassette recorder Jane now held in trembling hands could have come so close to, or may even have been touched by, whatever it was that was causing that horrible sound. The breathing faded, almost abruptly, followed by approximately ten seconds of absolute silence (not even the sound of the wood settling or a car driving by in the distance). Then the singing began. It was quite unmistakably, and most distinctly, the voice of an old woman--perhaps in her eighties, perhaps older--and although I could not make out the words, she was singing something. A lullabye, perhaps? To this day I am not sure, even though we've listened to the tape hundreds of times since and have tried amplifying the sound through various means. It is certainly not a melody I, or Jane, or anyone else we've shared the recording with, are familiar with, but by the very nature of its ambiguity, it has become an oft- controversial conversation piece among friends with similar interests.
What is shocking to me is that the pie was still good. Not just decent or eatable, but down right delicious. I started with a rotisserie chicken from the store. I still made the broth and gravy, and I still cut and sauteed the veggies until al dente, but that is about all I did by way of “work”. I am proud of myself for this. It is a small thing,. I like small things; if only now and then and when served warm.
You see, being a master of the interwebs, I vaguely recalled having heard this story before. Also, being a detector of BS, I detected... well... BS. With the simple Google search "ups uniforms ebay" I was routed to Snopes and, well, see for yourself. Took me only slightly longer than it took you to click that link to come to the conclusion this was bad information.
Pear Butter Blurb:
Powered energy Drinks
Faint moaning reached him from a tortured field;
Here’s a question. What if I don’t want to “hide my flaws”? What if I’m OK with them, and I just want to buy a goddamn dress to wear to a party. What if, even if I am not OK with my flaws, I am completely capable of buying my own underwear and don’t need your condescending “help”. Though, I might like to see what you have in the way of accessories?
The leaves become still
Doyle walked to the bed, picked up the book, and flipped through the pages. “The Count of Monte Cristo?” He gave Grayson a curious glance.
Under 16 Friday Full-£35 Discount-£32
Everyone has days like this, I think.
to make a little snowman and then she came
I'm guessing a lot of people are somewhere in between. Writing mostly in chronological order but having the freedom to jump around, or working off an outline so that you can write the "fun" scenes first and the connecting stuff later, or skipping over stuff with far less anxiety than it causes me if the need should arise, or starting with the scenes you see vividly, and then working from the beginning...I can think of a bunch of other examples but I'll stop now.
Now. I could get a music box or one of those crib-aquarium things that plays music, and use it in combination with the caterpillar lovey, or I could get a glo worm or similar which is music AND lovey all in one.
Grill ($20 and up):
“Neatly surmised,” the Pred drawled, somehow managing to hide his smile. “As always, you manage to find the crux of a matter, the very fulcrum!”
“This is the secret of the prolific writer. To agree to use small beans and the ingredients at hand.” (p. 34)
And that was it. We were pretty much led out of her office and given an appointment with a specialist. I got in the car, sobbing, and immediately, my mind went back to that ultrasound technician. She knew. She knew the whole time. And out of fear that we would notice something different about our baby's profile, she left that picture out. It all made sense.
Pat remarked, “Gee, the dripping has turned into a down pour. What the hell is happening?”
Soak coriander seeds, cumin seeds, toor dhal and raw rice in water ( May be few tsbp until they are fully immersed) for 10 - 15 minutes.
That about sums how I was feeling while I was doing these watercolor paintings of the Green Parrot Bar. My watercolor skills are minimul, so when I see something I want to change I have to start over. This Green Parrot series had nine takes. These are the only ones I can show you.
Executive Chef
Religion constitutes an effort toward unity. But by substituting the word ‘relationship’ we diminish that unity down to a bond between two individuals. It gives the notion that Christianity is a solo effort. Real unity requires that Christians get along. Religion is often marred by disunity because people attempt to unite over values and preferences. Factions are never the result of too much orthodoxy but based on the assumption that we could be united on anything other than right opinion.
Skirt: American apparel
3. Introduction by Annie Whitehead (0:18)
As I feared, Drake was targeted and they got to him. He says he will no longer do radio interviews because of people being “disrespectful and rude” except for a weekly report on FreedomReigns.com.
I am especially pleased that she explained that every time one
You cannot get angry with the guest you invited in with open, wanting arms.
When this is all over and done, whites will be able to return and there will be peace in South Africa and Whites will be appreciated, wanted and respected again. Blacks will at last be free and happy, because they will be thankful, thankful for the whites and what they contribute, thankful for being alive, thankful for having food and work.
I want to apologize for not getting back into my blog reading yet. Todd and I just took a week vacation by ourselves to celebrate our 15 year anniversary. Which really is in March, but didn't want to be with the spring breakers. :) I promise to commit as soon as I get settled back in. xoxo
“Are you sure I can’t trust your words?”
The wise old owl, the big black crow
I've been horribly afraid of any sort of bug for as long as I can remember, but since moving to Florida, I've had to slay dragons (a.k.a. lizards) and battle the ugly palmetto bug.
So here you go…
"When he arrived at his smallholding, he was shot in the head," said Du Plessis. "He even fell on the bag of potatoes I gave him."
(5) The circuit court will be the court with authority to hear cases but the tenant must wait a year after a review was first sought from the landlord before becoming entitled to apply to the court.
After that (because some of you are already asking!) -- well, 2012 is looking to be a big year already, and it's still months away.
the Japanese veggie pancake, Okonomi Yaki.
It might have been over for come weeks already but this is the first time that I am really sitting down to write about the Festival. This might be because last week we started with the debriefing sessions with the project partners and as such, have begun thinking about, talking about, and documenting the way the Festival rolled out this year: what worked, what didn’t, and what developments we w/sh/could make in the future. If any of you know me in my FTH:K capacity, you’ll know that we always hold debriefing sessions after major projects and everyone shares how they think the programme went. This kind of “unpacking” session is vital, for a number of reasons: it calls on all the participants to think critically about the event and its success (or lack thereof, as the case may be). It calls on them to think about how things could have been done differently (in the case of less success) or how things could have been capitalised on further (in the case of success). It also gives everyone a chance to look at how they personally inputted into the event, both positively and negatively, and by doing so, encourages people to develop a sense of ownership of the project, which not only takes the pressure off company/project leaders but also ensures a more committed team for future work.
Schenk’s study is written for a scholarly audience familiar with the history of early modern Europe as he assumes knowledge of the era and is especially for those academics interested in diplomatic history. This is evident in his source base which is derived from the letters of European diplomats and leaders such as Castlereagh, Canning, Metternich, Burke, and Alexander I. Besides these diplomatic exchanges, Schenk’s narrative is based on extensive research and primary source documents including government documents, personal letters, and popular literature of the period. Using these sources, the author presents narrative that attempts to show how the Concert of Europe failed.
Positions: SEVERAL
you guessed it!
For the lentils: Pour water into a small pot and add the lentils, tomatoes and onion (make sure the top of the lentils are covered in water). Drop in a tablespoon of your choice of oil. Cover and cook on medium-high heat for 30-45 minutes, depending on desired texture, stirring occasionally. The water should evaporate. When most of the water has disappeared, add salt and pepper and pour in enough apple cider vinegar to cover 1/3 of the lentils. Yes, vinegar is sour, but apple cider vinegar’s sweetness will balance that. And because lentils have a somewhat tough exterior, the vinegar won’t overwhelm them.
On April 21st, 2012 we hosted our 1st Annual 5K called bFIT4Lifers Run 4U. I can say I was grateful for the 19 participants that did register and the 18 that ran. The Wednesday, the week of our race the forecast was calling for rain so I started praying. We had been promoting this event since January and the week prior to the event we didn’t have alot of participants registered. Only 2 walkers and 5 runners to be exact. I prayed for great running weather, and I thank the Lord it turned out to be awesome. The weather made all the difference on race day for walk-ins. The rain came later that evening.
A good life, like a good story, is in the moments.
Local foods: local milk, local ice cream
So Northern sinners, repent. For it is written, "Thou shall sparkle all cask conditioned beer. Unsparkled beer is an abomination in the eyes of the Lord".
“Gah!!! What the hell? Where did they…oh my god, when did they? Aaahhhh!” I was turning over and over in the mirror, finding more and more lines running up from places and directions I never thought they would ever come from. They looked like the Evil Ghost’s hands in a horror films, reaching up to capture the youthfulness of my skin. My mother heard my shrieks and came running.
If your exercise routine is off track, start by finding something you really enjoy doing — walking, biking, or swimming — and adding 10 minutes of that exercise to your day. Before you know it, exercise will have become a daily routine.
This was published in 'Punch' back in the nineteen sixties, and was written about the time that everyone was getting a bit fed up with pollution, and sterile rivers etc.
This excursion into the tiny lanes of Flanders is an FA Cup Final, a SuperBowl, an Olympic opening ceremony and a Rodeo all rolled into one.
We are planning a day at the beach AND
I stood up to say good-bye like all the rest
We get annoyed at ourselves. We zoom in on the small things gone wrong and become angry and disappointed – and we cannot fully focus on the next course of actions we were supposed to take.
I've made three, two of which I've worn pretty much on a weekly basis since I first made them. The third wasn't so successful as I made the sleeveless version which for me, just didn't work. I've since added sleeves so hope to get a lot more wear out of it in the warmer weather as the fabric is so lovely.
artymcgoo@yahoo.com
Liam is about to keep guessing when his phone vibrates with a text message. He reaches into his pocket and grabs his phone and checks the number. Recognizing it, he puts it back into his pocket.
Once your Dried Anchovies Soup is boiling, par boil the
10.) "Spacelords" from Human Giant (2007)
The recent speech by the Attorney-General Dominic Grieve on Human Rights, The European Court of Justice and the principle of subsidiarity
That’s as far as I got yesterday…as Lyndee would say, “We had a busy day!”
One of my father's favourite sayings was, "It's a bad workman that blames his tools." It was quoted to us often when we blamed the brush/shovel/hammer we were using for a job badly done. But I have been reading about such things and have gleaned some interesting information which I pass on to you.
The chosen of God are portrayed as an olive tree. Gentiles (non-Messianic Christians) have been grafted into the plan as “wild shoots”. The Christian church is merely an extension of God’s plan already in effect, and we are but those added onto the “natural tree”, the Jewish people. We did not replace the Jewish people in God’s heart, they remain the olive tree with deep roots and strong constitution. And we do not support the root, but the root – the origination of God’s chosen people – supports us. We were added in later, by faith. And we are warned that we are not indispensable, as even the natural branches were not so.
July 23 - Chip Mayer, actor (Vance Duke on "The Dukes of Hazzard"), 57
Beau and I seem to have got "Our Story" down pact now that we have been back together for about 3 months. We dated for about a year and half in college at USF where we met with all of his fraternity brothers (Sigma Chi) and my sorority sisters (Tri Delta) at Olive Garden. There was a mutual, instant attraction and curiosity to get to know each other and once we were introduced we started dating instantly.
The alpha coefficient was too high; the risk too great. Losing my balance, I plummeted to the darkest recesses of the canyon. I had to release my tenuous grip on the briefcase, so I could pull my chute in my panic; it spilled classified papers all over the floor of the ravine when it exploded on impact. Struggling to free myself from the parachute, I cursed the debacle this mission had become. After finally getting the parachute to release me, I started to ponder over the enigma of where I was.
And there we were, back in the lower 48 of the USA with Alaska 2000 miles behind us. We felt a little sad that our Alaska adventures were over but we were looking forward to visiting Glacier National Park, Yellowstone, Grand Tetons, Devil's Tower National Monument, the Crazy Horse Memorial... well, you get the idea. We still had plenty of sight-seeing ahead of us, plus would be visiting family and friends along the way.
The first is a fun hot air balloon artwork that is made entirely from Pink Paislee papers, stamps, twine, packaging, Basically Bare chipboard, felt, canvas, and cardboard shapes, AND wire. Oh and LOTS of hot glue! Tee hee... I did this in conjunction with Basically
It might be darn expensive and somewhat hard to rinse (shredded coconut in curly wet hair? It takes time!) but it's the first schampoo I've ever tried that doesn't make my scalp itch or makes the hair feel dry and frizzy. A good haircolor is easier to find than a good schampoo so I am sticking with this one.
I love you, Hubby. I love you, I miss you, and I don’t even care how uncool I sound when I whine about you being gone.
So if you ever see someone ducking behind a rack of clothing or pretending they don't see you. Don't take it personally. They might be uncomfortable seeing acquaintances/coworkers in places where they wouldn't usually see you like the office or church.
The car dock for iPhone is plug & play, there is no need for workshop installation.
I spent most of Saturday wandering around the Midland Antique and Collectible Festival in Michigan. I had an amazing time, even though it was crazy hot and humid, and a tornado siren went off at one point. I was terrified, but everyone else was acting like there was nothing going on, even though the siren was deafening, so I just waited it out and fortunately nothing happened.
A maximum of eight PNRs per user ID per month shall be permissible. The passengers can book seats/berths on the e-ticket on the web portal against General quota/Tatkal quota/Ladies quota/Senior Citizen Quota. No concessions, except Senior Citizen concession, will be allowed on e-tickets. No Group Booking shall be permissible on e-ticketing through Indian Railway Web Portal.
“As the world sleeps, India awakes to freedom”, Jawaharlal Nehru declared as he became free India’s first prime minister. It was the midnight hour of August 14-15, 1947. Some wags granted Nehru his eloquence but raised a minor technicality. Since it was 12 AM in India, it was actually daytime or evening in much of the world, which therefore was quite wide awake, thank you! Today we might be on more solid ground in paraphrasing Nehru’s words: “As the world awakes to its dangers, India sleepwalks into nuclear peril“.
But fighting all alone
It will change absolutely nothing in the world - will not save Africa or be a hit on You Tubeless but, it's only Rock n Roll.
Matthew Rose (bass)
Round Two covers all-new ground with offerings from a gang of tried-and-true heavyweights and inspired up-and-comers, all savvy purveyors of pulp at the top of their game. Haymakers include a Hemingway pastiche by famed mystery author Bill Pronzini, a stunning Chandler homage by Hard Case Crime kingpin Charles Ardai, a post-war tale with a twist from James Reasoner, a zombie-horror nightmare by Bill Crider, and even more blows to the temple from such hotshots as Glenn Gray, Patricia Abbott, Chris F. Holm, Vicki Hendricks, Sean Chercover, the legendary Vin Packer, and more, more, more!
The Year Without Michael is told from the point of view of sixteen year old Jody, Michael's older sister. In this era before cellphones and the Internet, Jody is plunged into a world of uncertainty. Her parents are devastated, her younger sister is acting out, and yet Jody has to cope with everyday life, school, friends, family.
May 9 – Metropolis (Montreal, PQ) #
There is a depiction in the story about how a rumour can ruin a Bank if suddenly all the depositors come to the Bank to withdraw the money. The Banking industry works on the basis of taking money from people and then investing it to make more money. If everybody comes to ask their money back at the same time, no Bank would be able to return it and would go bankrupt. Banking works on trust of depositors and if that is lost, Bank is gone. Much later I had read a short story to the similar effect but more about that some other time. In this book, the protagonist saves the Bank by making sure that all the people who turned up to get their money got it, but in reality it will most likely result in bankruptcy.
“…so many people live within unhappy circumstances and yet will not take the initiative to change their situation because they are conditioned to a life of security, conformity and conservatism, all of which may appear to give one peace of mind,…” – Chris McCandless, “Into The Wild”
You undertook a new life of embodiment. Find out how long you lived in this new body, and what you learned for that time.
Anyway, it's interesting to think back on the process of how The Dark and Hollow Places got from point A (time to ponder the third book!) to point Z (on shelves March 22, 2011!). Especially as I embark on new projects (lips sealed) and get excited about where those might be in the future. For me, there's always something a little magical about the process -- a part of me that will likely never understand how it works and thus is terrified that one day it won't. But there's fun in the magic -- in that moment when you realize you've written the foundation for a point you hadn't even considered but once you realize it... wow, it works (or rather, that's the hope!).
8) A Jolt of Motivation. To get in the right mindset I check out the literary quote of the day on my iGoogle page, read a few inspiring blogs, or take some time with a photograph or piece of artwork. Seeing the creative output of others motivates me to join the ranks and create something all my own.
My secret? I’m not sure I really have one! I was a bit of a lippy teenager myself once and now I live with my teenage daughter so I draw on experience to create my characters. Nothing beats having a member of your target audience on hand to check whether your dialogue is right or wrong.
9. Feel The Groove
Instead, use words that lift up and encourage. You will see a difference in your husband’s behavior if you do. Talk about him to others in a positive way. Ask him questions about his life, work, hobbies, and friends.
Research is in order
Then it was lunch time and I started getting really nervous because this afternoon at 2:00 was the agent Q and A panel followed by agent meetings...and I was signed up to meet with an agent. The panel Q and A was fantastic. Four different agents representing vastly different genres, all in the same room and available for us eager writers to pick their brains...which we did. They were a wealth of information.
You don't get this kind of action getting thrown out of a bar.
And we play.
I’m going to be good and wait until I finish up another foundation before getting this one… *sigh*
Edo State and the country at large, is a statement of do-or-
F: And yeah, might as well do it properly.
-Large patio that is dog-friendly as long as no other patron complain. But really, this is Austin. If you don't like dogs, go back to Houston.
I have the strength to face all conditions by the power that Christ gives me! Amen!
The story starts this past Saturday. Visiting my friends, Javen and Justine (aka T.T., still don't know where that nickname came from), in Schenectady, NY, just a two-hour drive from my home in hardcore urban Syracuse, we had gone to dinner and watched a few innings of the Yankees-Red Sox blowout before heading back for a brief cocktail at the apartment and then out to hopefully more bars. Will was already bitter due to the Red Sox taking an 0-3 dive in the ALCS, and I was just happy to be drunk. We went to a small convenience store, where we looked for the cheapest possible selections. I chose my favorite, Miller High Life, the best cheap beer known to man. But what for our second selection? Which beer would serve a dual function as both an economically-prudent choice but also one that would please the tastebuds as well? The choice was simple: Golden Anniversary, proudly brewed in my hometown of Rochester, New York.
“I have a couple more to get,” I said.
The word used for remission is not the same as we use for “cancer is in remission.” In that case, it may come back. That would be the imperfect tense. The Greek word means “dismissal, release.”
Few aspects are as fun and interesting as when Mercury is in creative Aries and Venus is in curious Gemini! This is a time when brainstorming can lead to new projects and helpful social connections. To make the most of this aspect in an otherwise challenging week, keep your conversations light and save the heavier topics for another time, when you’ll be able to work out the finer details without getting bogged down.
I have a dear friend who is contemplating adopting a child from a third world country. In our discussions, I have been acutely aware (more than usual) about the many things that we have been blessed with. We take the little everyday conveniences for granted.
“But how do I do that?’’ I asked.
Communist China heads for major power status and is now more economically significant than Japan. "Third World" values take hold in the west and are proving nearly impossible to eradicate, largely thanks to multiculturalism and it's pathetic inability to tell right from wrong. Western taxpayers subsidise Middle Eastern family "values" and lifestyles that are unsustainable without government assistance.
“What?… I can’t” I said, thinking he was joking
and since I do not own an ipad (or iphone or ipod ),
I loved how the 3 characters in the book all came together, each had their own story, yet they all fit together so well, but I did get distracted by the fact that each chapter was about a different person, it disrupted the flow for me even though I did enjoy the story line.
Is it wrong that I want a whole wall inside full of plants?! Before Jon realizes it.. he will be living in a mother fucking rainforest.
Sans street- and road-maintenance, vehicles bostled about (I'm inventing the word "bostle" -- a combination of bumped, jostled, blundered and struggled),
Paul was not to relate himself with the unfruitful works of darkness of those Jews. He was to go to the Gentiles and that without delay.
the former roommate of 4th Degree Knight of Columbus Alan Keyes.
As I said, yesterday, I got my Kitchen brains in gear and decided to make a huge pan of weight watchers one point soup (I am not letting down the side of I have a fat arse and I like it! It is unbelievably tasty and simple) and a pan of pearl barley in tomato and basil sauce. All the ingredients for this (including the brand new tupperware) came in at below £10 and I have enough for an entire week.
I was full of grandiose plans to lose 20 pounds before Market, but that hasn't happened because of being sick for so long. I still start coughing and hacking if I get the least bit winded, so exercise is out and then I feel sorry for myself because I am still blowing alien life forms out of my nose every 17 seconds, so I eat popovers. I have a thing about eating popovers when I am going through long periods of stress or discomfort. Some people need chocolate. I self-medicate with puffy bread.
Aveline's busy morning consisted of sleep, eat, sleep, poo, eat, sleep, sleep some more...Fun stuff!
After all this I AM walking out of here with my carte.
Yes, Gatlin must be discussed here. Hard to dismiss a man that once won back to back championships (‘04/’05) and set a WR. Puts him in the same position as current world #1 Usain Bolt. And while the talk will immediately go to “yeah but he was banned, and without taking sides, I have to say that the ban occurred after he won the championships and did not include anything he did in those years (that’s why I gave him two sets of PR’s). I say that because the issue has never been Gatlin’s ability to compete. He’s done that well at every level – high school, college, professional. The question on the table is: can he return to either form (9.85 or 9.77) after FOUR years away from the sport? If he can get into some decent races (he faces being blackballed in the better events) we will see what he can do. If he can regain form we could have an awesome one, two punch. But right now the odds aren’t in his favor.
Before I start sounding like someone with a geriatric fetish, there are a million areas that are just out of bounds: and what’s funny is that they are kept out of bounds by the same people who say that there are no new ideas.
Prebius: well that’s different
I am more or less a novice at this and still learning the tricks of video photography, especially of the close-up, hand-held camera kind. The experience I have gained from years of still photography helps, though.
Everyone loves Gooseberry Patch! This cookbook has tried and true recipes that can be made in minutes. Healthy, yummy, and basic, just like this Mama of 6 likes it!
Luckily, my parents allowed me to go on various school exchanges to Australia and the U.S. For all parents out there - nothing can teach your child more confidence than being in a foreign country on their own, and staying with a different family... particularly the U.S. When I came back to my school, I was more happy with myself. After having seen more of the world, I realized what a small portion of it my school truly was, and that really, my stay was only temporary. I stopped caring about the cliques, or what people thought of me 24/7. I became more of an observer, and with that came my salvation. Because if you take yourself out of the equation, you suddenly see the world with different eyes.
Did you notice her uncle owns FOUR laundromats?
Turns out that hard work pays off. Huh. Who knew?
In addition to actual physical violence and torture, the government has honed the art of psychological torture at the nation’s airports. The sexual molestation of children is defended by the TSA and the Department of Homeland Security as a necessary component in the war on terrorism.
That visit changed the whole way I thought about Isabel's house. I still didn't have a very visual imagination. But now I didn't need one. I knew exactly what Isabel's house looked like – I'd been there.
Kind of scatterbrained right now, got a lot going on.
I've been a mother to two for six months. Adopting two children who have quickly become the lights of my life! As they are older, there is much pressure to do (though I'm sure this internal & external pressure can occur even if one has a wee babe in arms). I don't have many mummy friends, being only the second of all my friends to become a mother, the other had her first baby last year. The parents at the school gate are older and always seem so much more put together than I am. Their children seem to be masters at everything: yoga, ballet, tap, gymnastics, soccer, hockey, music, swimming and skating. They busily discuss how filled each weekend is with friend's Birthdays, which must be celebrated, and skiing and tutors and, and, and...For the first few weeks, or months, I wondered if I was doing my children a disservice. What if that tutor would make all the difference? What if not being able to skate yet becomes a sore point? What if they never catch up after such a rocky start in life? But slowly, one day, when on a long Sunday walk through the woods with a friend I realized something profound - my children are masters at nothing except being children. They know how to run, skip, hop and jump. They love collecting sticks (& counting them!), they like to giggle, laugh, tickle and be tickled. They like to explore and jump in puddles and visit farms and visit the ducks. And for them that is the good life.
A. Government of a country is not supposed to dialogue with terrorists. If they
Well, incredibly, the answer appears to have been 'Yes': The UK Border Agency confirmed it is in the process of attempting to remove the Iranian man. A spokesman said: ‘We are reviewing this incident and, if necessary, will take appropriate action.
When I returned home later that night I climbed quickly into bed—shivering half from the cold of the night and half from the disturbing memories of the haunted house. As I lay under the covers of my bed, I realized that earlier in the day my mother had changed my bedding from the light blankets and sheets of the summer to the heavy blankets and quilts she used to keep us warm during the cold nights of winter. This bedding felt heavy upon me, and I was quickly warmed of the chill I had experienced all evening from standing outside in the cold. As I was drifting off to sleep, I could hear my mother in the kitchen. She was finishing the countless chores that consumed her day as the mother of twelve children. By the sounds and smells I knew she was preparing a meal our family would enjoy the next day. I knew that I was in a secure and warm place. I was resting comfortably under a quilt my mother had sewn with her own hands. The fear I felt from my memories of the haunted house quickly left me as I dismissed the demons that had frightened me earlier that evening.
Round 8: Change back to main color. Ch 3. Dc around. Join with sl st to top ch of ch 3. (35 dc)
“I bet. Well, I think I’ve got it.”
And it has pretty much stayed that way, hasn't it?
Let's start with the "Blogging Ideas" list. I am still using this as a way to jot down future ideas for topics or titles or things I don't want to forget!
The Guardians will protect and serve.
Coming up this summer, we're working on bringing out my first three crime novels—Forgiving Solomon Long, Deliver Us From Evelyn, and the book that was published as Tribulation House—in brand-new eBook editions. As we get deeper into the process, I'm considering whether (or how much) to revise these books. These books are more shoot-em-ups with cops and mobsters and con men and all other types. These books also have quirky characters, but many of them are quirky and also quite dangerous.
Retail Comps – ML#38887812 $217,000, ML#1118321 $155,000, ML#28983950 $169,900
Out of them.
That didn't happen. The closest I got was when his best friend that was older and not at all attractive developed a crush on me. But that wasn't happening. I mean surely Joe would never date a girl that had gone out with his best friend. Besides, if nothing else, I was loyal. I was Joe's girl even if he didn't know it. How could I date someone else when my heart belonged to the boy in the acid washed jeans and polo shirt with the collar turned up? A little stalkerish. Perhaps. But hey, I was a stupid high school kid that thought Joe was the greatest thing since sliced bread. (Not that I ever dated sliced bread.) Besides with my luck, the minute I got a boyfriend, Joe would realize his love for me and I wouldn't be available. I spent almost 7 years pining for him, but nothing ever happened.
I'm thinking of setting up an online course on corporate responsibility, with guest speakers and experts from around the world taking part.
You know what I did?
I cannot leave home without… credit cards and underwear.
The quality of the cards is actually pretty good without feeling or looking like the cardboard cousins of the '91 Topps baseball set. My son watched the re-runs of this show. Now that he is a teenager, he might appreciate having the girls' cards.
Our drive home reminded me of the contrast between the spiritual wilderness I endured for several years since moving to California and the rest and growth I’ve begun to enjoy in the last few months. Here’s a little taste of my spiritual “desert vacation,” an excerpt from a piece I wrote and posted two years ago:
Have a plan for it: My guess is that you wouldn’t purchase a new $5,000 machine for your SMB without knowing exactly how it was going to help your business. You’d probably have metrics and charts and ways to evaluate how it all worked before you ever brought it home. So don’t make a social media investment without identifying these same metrics. That Twitter or Facebook account may be free, but you pay with the time you’re investing. Develop a plan.
That said, my First Filmcraft is based on the Michael Mann Film, The Insider.
By Dave’s own admission the beer is “only just old enough to be out at night on its own” and the decision to bottle and present it on Thursday night was made at about four o’clock on the same day and so some more time will see it present at its very best. Punters can expect to see it in bottles in about two weeks but the lucky ones at Beer Deluxe were treated to something very special as it really ‘sang’ with the dessert tasting plate.
A story about three people searching for love in the most unconventional way. Bryan Finley and his partner Damien Earley would like a third in their relationship. While Damien is on a business trip, Bryan meets Mara Devine a sultry sexy vixen who’s insatiable and wants the same. Damien has other thoughts in mind but Mara does everything in her power to turn the tables in her favor.
Helen MacGillivray, president and founder of Miss Helen's Image Consulting received professional accreditation from the Sterling Style Academy, an internationally recognized institute in New York City. Miss Helen's provides quality service to clients who are searching to define their own unique style.
Mary encourages her students to make their own sampler. She gives some examples and helpful hints on how to do that. Mary also has some simple You Tube videos online that we have
Thanks to help from a co-worker, we were able to do twice the work in half the time tonight. I should be caught up for at least an hour. Thought I'd put some proverbial pen to the paper real quick.
Dan: Yes, but the phone I’m on isn’t fully charged.
What I need to do to is to sit in front of them as simple and open and honest as I can, vulnerable and imperfect, and listen to them with a sincere desire to understand their world, to respect it, to connect with it. And patiently wait for the inspection and evaluation period to be over and to, perhaps eventually, be honoured to be trusted and invited.
The seating arrangements are done as beautiful little vignettes. I love the symmetrical balance in this seating area, which is in everything except the art. A little asymmetry adds fun and keeps the look from being too formal.
A message that travels across the ocean to it’s destination..
Hubby: But I look SEXY.
The committee chairman said the committee had directed prisons department officials to install mobile phone jammers to stop prisoners from using mobile phones.
Check out their mission statement to get the full effect, and be sure to make this a side trip when you’re in the NY/NJ area ~ it’s unparalleled!
And these attacks aren’t ‘opportunistic crimes’ – but are carefully planned: Pretoria News journalist Grahame Hosken reported that CCTV footage from Botha's home security system showed a white Toyota Corolla driving past his home several times shortly before the gunmen launched their attack. The gunmen, who were armed with a Colt 45, attacked Botha as he walked towards his carport and shot him in the pelvis at point-blank range. Neighbour Jaco Engelbrecht said he was in his garage when he heard a gunshot. "As I ran outside I saw two men driving slowly out of the driveway in Jan's car. I did not know what was happening and watched as they drove off," he said.
this is some seriously sweet shiz, guysers. but let me tell you, totally worth rotting your teeth out over. :) using our favorite gluten-free chocolate chip recipe, vanilla sandwhich cookies and Celine's gluten free fudge brownies the ultimate chocolate chip cookie 'n "oreo" fudge brownie bars were created and demolished faster than the speed of light.
Conair Infiniti Pro-Spin Air Brush or i-Stubble $44.99 Final Price: varies
Bachmann: yes but we have no jail for
Instead of the usual ending to my post, I’m gonna make it a bit more informal… maybe then someone will suggest an idea for a future post… Drop me a line, hit me up, shoot me a message, or just plain email me–however you do it, I’d love to hear from y’all. As Rotary would say, “Peace.”
Some fabric scraps
a cold these days.
I won't have time to work on it until the weekend, so keep me in your prayers :-)
Sofa is in Good condition with a beautiful light pink fabric, however the chairs are very worn.
So, here are the pics!!!
The old belief about mermaids was that they had no souls. In order to preserve her immortal soul, Margaret is ready to desert her husband and children. Was she right to follow her beliefs? Or wrong to cause her loved ones so much pain?
And in case you were wondering, I never did figure out who the woman was. Curses.
I don't know what kind of scientist would pin a fly to the wall to see it through a microscope, but I suppose Ms. Coolidge-Rask might have known some.
But, over the last six months, bra shopping and the required expenditure just didn’t make the top of the list. I would go to Target, look at a bra, go ‘ah, looks about right’ and come home, try it on, feel a bit uncomfortable or feel like my boobs were still a bit saggier than I’d like, but figure it was more difficult to take the bra back than to just deal with it.
The hospital was in Walnut Creek, CA and I wasn't aware of what a super nice area it is. The downtown is really cute, there are tons of nice restaurants, and so much shopping! I'd definitely like to come back and spend some more time here. Last night, my cousin Erin had everyone over to her house for dinner, and it was a great way to finish the weekend.
So Stan Smith could be considered the great-great grandson of Ralph Cramden.
I choose to focus on things I can change.
Resveratrol is converted to piceatannol in humans after consumption. Piceatannol also has been found to act as fat blocker.
In “The Little Blue Book”, Buéno cites 2 specific events in which the Smurfs are racist and anti-semitic. The first example Buéno uses is the character Smurfette, the only female Smurf in the whole community. Buéno contests that Smurfette represents a Nazi, meeting the Aryan ideal of beauty with her long blonde hair and refined features.
11.) Who handles subsidiary rights, electronic rights, foreign rights for your agency?
Swaying potential buyers away from a standing start in 11 seconds flat but the mitsubishi vehicles uk, variable injections still help produce respectable urge through the mitsubishi vehicles uk and brutal with the mitsubishi vehicles uk with quick shifting fingertip control. The brakes are marshalled by an upgraded intercooler and the gearbox bizarrely chases the mitsubishi vehicles canada of any other model with a more manageable price.
I couldn't resist reaching for the fish sauce with this one. However, you can easily make it vegetarian and vegan-friendly by substituting with soy sauce plus an extra pinch of sugar. Either way, the flavours will be big, bold, bodacious. Enjoy.
I sat there and stared at the camera and at the computer equipment and was overwhelmed. The day I lost my camera equipment was a big blow to me and my photography career. But it returned to me through a generous donor (I still don’t know who this person is—and I don’t know if this person knew that the camera that was stolen was a Canon 30D, so to gift me with a Canon 30D was wonderful!). And now that I will be on my own for a while because my job is ending, I needed a newer computer…and there it is. I do ask myself, “Why me?” But then I have to put that question out of my head and just accept what is, because whatever it is, is beautiful. And I am deeply grateful.
WIE: To be honest, when I first saw the subtitle of your book I assumed you were speaking metaphorically. But after reading the book, and speaking with you about it now, I am definitely getting the sense that you mean it much more literally than I had thought. One thing in your book that really stopped me in my tracks was your statement that, according to your interpretation, the entire physical universe only existed in a realm of countless evolving possibilities until at one point, the possibility of a conscious, sentient being arose and that, at that point, instantaneously, the entire known universe came into being, including the fifteen billion years of history leading up to that point. Do you really mean that?
Hell Train: Solaris paperback, January 2012, 319 pages, cover art by Graham Humphreys. Christopher Fowler has published some thirty books, mostly horror novels and collections, but also the Bryant & May series of mystery novels. He is a five-time winner of the British Fantasy Award, including best novel for Full Dark House, and has been nominated for the Stoker Award, World Fantasy Award, and others. Based on this impressive track record, we named Hell Train one of the four "seeded" novels for the Spring 2012 Battle of the Books.
Other: (Leaf Rockabye Thickers, Taffy Vera Thickers) American Crafts, (Blue Lush Rhinestones) My Mind's Eye, (Stitched Brad from the Kioshi collection) BasicGrey, (Old Olive felt flower, Spiral Punch) Stampin' Up!.
This weekend was perfect — rented a giant tiller, and cut up my front yard, making borders for mulch and bulbs. Kristin wanted a garden, too, so I headed to back yard to make one long run, for tomatoes and beans and lettuce.
I couldn't decide which picture to show you, so I'm showing you all 3!
Day 4:
Lifter of this head
Bo Bunny Et Cetera Combo Sticker Sheet
Yesterday at our guild, I learned how to make a mold in silicone so using a finding of a leaf, I made a mold.
I've had the ARC of Cross Currents by John Shors since last fall, so I finally decided to finally get this one read. I'm about halfway through it and I love it! I love tropical vacations and the vivid descriptions make me want to go to Thailand now.
Still, I was rather happy to wear it again, though I don't think I can wear it as I used to, bare legged and with sandals. I need tights or leggings under it now, with my fish white legs that just don't do above the knee dresses anymore!
Learn the rules for writing, practice them, internalize them, then FORGET THEM. Otherwise you’ll kill your natural voice. If you “write like they tell you,” your prose will sound stilted and unnatural. Or beige, which is worse.
Claritin Save $2/1 10ct+ (4/22)
While she it is very intense being around my daughter because she is so intense as a person,she certainly forces people to question their ideals; "ideas not ideals" is a favorite saying of hers.
The only way to reduce the scale of discrimination is to use the equivalent of 'mystery shoppers' to expose it and bring prosecutions. It wouldn't change the underlying attitudes but it might force compliance with the law when word of court cases went round the employment agencies, letting agencies and other sectors.
I'm sure you recognize my favorite baker's twine from The Twinery as well.
Just like every year, they have made a stylish campaign. And this time, it looks quite a lot like the normal line. It's great to see them next to each other, there is no other conclusion then to say it all looks look ravishing, both the models and the clothes! On the left you see Belgian topmodel Hannelore Knuts, and on the right size 14 Deborah, my BrigitteModels colleague.
Tullian grew up in a loving, nurturing Christian home. All through his life, he never doubted the existence of God, never disbelieved in the authority of the Bible and the reality of Jesus and the cross. He just simply wanted to have fun and live his life the way he wanted to live it without anyone telling him what to do. His great fear was if he surrendered his life over to the Lord, God would strip him of all of the fun and excitement that this world has to offer.
With the front and rear radii cut in the sides, the next step was to cut the door opening. As mentioned, the door opening has been set as far back toward the rear of the trailer as possible to make ingress/egress as easy as possible. The other locating dimension for the door was to raise the door opening 3" above the deck height to allow for some mattress thickness to extend above the opening and not create an lip to get hung up on when getting in and out of the camper. Otherwise, the door opening is based on the dimensions of the ARE truck cap walk through door dimensions of 22" x 39" I purchased, which I'll explain in the next post.
to argue with sparrows in the sun
Albert Mohler rightly points out the doctrinal minimalism of megachurches and the general tendency for Evangelicalism to accomodate itself to the larger culture in order to draw in new members. Serial remarriage is now commonly accepted among Evangelicals due to no fault divorce. Will gay marriage now be accepted by so-called "conservative" Evangelical Christians? It looks that way judging from a recent sermon series by pastor Andy Stanley, the son of Southern Baptist pastor, Dr. Charles Stanley.
In middle school I had several equally outcast friends, and we formed a decent group of loner kids. I still thought that I was better than a few, and I played into popularity like almost every other kid. There was one girl in particular who I thought was at least lower than me on the social food chain. I am not proud but I took many of my frustrations out on her, and made fun of her with my friends. I felt like making fun of her made me better somehow, and I wasn’t very nice.
Mezzo-soprano Geeta Novotny as Carmen
60 minutes of intense kicking butt.
We spent several hours at the museum and saw lots of different things. The spinning tunnel at the end was very disorienting! I’m glad we drove down, but accessibility problems really detracted from the visit. The journey down the stairs was difficult. the stairs were so steep and tall that even without a stroller they would have made me nervous. They can’t be safe for senior citizens either. I really wish they would make this place more accessible!
Liz makes her home in Nashville, TN, where she enjoys theater, exploring the local music scene, and making frequent trips to Arizona to dote on her two nephews and three nieces. She loves stories of true love with happy endings. Keep up with Liz's adventures in writing at www.lizjohnsonbooks.com.
As for knitting, I’ve done 36 of the 40 rounds of the ribbing on the second Zauberball sock. So I should get to the good bit today, without difficulty. And should be very close to finishing, if I don’t actually do it, at Loch Fyne at the weekend.
of aural love
I left Cam and Livi by themselves. I put them on speaker phone and wore my running shoes. I figured the school was just down the block- if I heard a fire break out I could call 911 and make it back before the fire truck got there.
Along part of this walk, is a section where I took a picture of yellow wild flowers last year. I don’t know if they’ll be back. There’s so much wood byproduct – chips, bark and needles covering the ground. One can only hope.
Santorum: Mitt Romney personally
as long as there is that life-line
Knowing that she just might make it into the sisterhood
3) Know your customers. Like, really know them. On your contact form, request as much information possible. You never know when you might need to know the name of their mother-in-law’s best friend’s dog.
I have wonderful girlfriends.
Just as muscles which perform the same exercises over and over again will become accustomed to them, adapt and then stop growing new muscle tissue—which necessitates changing exercise routines to create muscle confusion, allowing continuous muscle growth—the SSF may also adapt to multiple sperm and eventually shut down, initiating menopause. This happens when the same group of men continue to deposit sperm over time with no introduction of a new sperm variable. The SSF will always pick the same genetic makeup (the best) when presented with the same group of men over and over again. The body will eventually not even recognize the inferior sperm and will function as if there were only one sperm donor, with no need for SSF activity.
5. Read it for the last time.
Are we really going to set the bar that low? This is the voice of an apologist, not a senior human rights advocate.
Look at the bosoms whilst I attempt to sort my discrepant thoughts.
For a good result in a garden you don't need much
I whipped up a cute little Easter egg activity. You can either let the kids choose a number to develop their fact family, or you can program the number yourself (that way you can differentiate for your little eggheads)! Hope you enjoy it!
water, and let the dough sit for a bit.
We get a good simple introduction to start, with a timeline running from Atomic Armageddon in 2012, through the encounter with the Pé Choi and others - including the Shén - into the Terran Empires and Clonemaster dynasties, past mentions of subatomic planetbuster bombs and the interfogulator, right up to c. 111,912 when Tékumel is lost.
The “Beyond MS Association of Canada” is a national charity that has advocated for MS sufferers since 1997. The “New Hope for Multiple Sclerosis 2011 Canada Tour” is its latest venture in the hopes of making testing, treatment and follow-up care widely available in Canada. This Tour is being sponsored by Canadian businesses and individuals who have joined their voices and resources to make a difference and give “New Hope” to the MS community in Canada.
My upcoming show this Friday at TastySpace Gallery in Las Vegas is titled 'The Inevitable Mouthwatering: Small Treats, Big Treats, & Neon Streets'. Comprised of eighteen works, it is primarily about mouthwatering foodstuffs. But four of the eighteen are not food at all. They are vintage Las Vegas neon sign paintings, which seems rather odd, I know. Like the food paintings (of which you'll see more in the days ahead after the opening, when I've had a chance to take photos of the exhibit and then nap for twelve straight hours due to exhaustion) the neon sign paintings are bright and bold with color. In that sense they blend. And ultimately, all my works is less about the subject and more about the emotion evoked by the colors and patterns the subjects create. It works this way for food as well as neon signage.
Another mystery never to be resolved.
Creative Individual
Our office has collaborated with the Myrtle Avenue Revilatization Project (MARP), a registered non-profit, to collect donations for all the 491 & 493 Myrtle Avenue residents. Donations will be evenly distributed to all families affected. If you are donating funds, please make checks/money orders out to MARP. Specify “491 & 493 Myrtle Emergency Fund” in the memo field-
So last night I, as per diligent old man student usual, went to bed at 10pm for my classes this morning starting at 8am. But, then I woke up around 3am from a discomfort I'd felt before and confused me the first time around, on December 21st. But now, Round 2, I knew exactly what it was - freaking menstrual cramps.
Why would I bother with a wordy, direct reply to your question, when I had the option of making it quick and easy with the push of a button?
With Photoshop, putting together an HDR image is as easy as:
This past week, I purchased polarizing filters for each of my two current lenses. Now, if you do your research, you will find many photographers recommend that you purchase more expensive and professional-grade filters, the rationale being that if you are using a camera with an expensive and sensitive sensor, and an expensive and sensitive lens, why throw a cheap piece of poorly-made poorly-ground filter glass on front of the whole thing and ruin your pictures? There’s some sound logic there, but I chose to go with two fairly generic (Kenko) filters. I paid about $20 for the 52mm and $25 for the 58mm. The reality is, I don’t have the budget to buy “the best” of everything in my kit. I am saving up currently for a very good, very expensive tripod (more on this in a later post), and I feel like my limited budget is better spent investing now in a great tripod that will last than spending ~$100 each for some polarizing filters. Compromise: it’s a real pain in the ass, but it is what it is.
On a personal and literary note, I went to one of my former teacher’s conference at Blue Metropolis literary festival and those who called for the death of the printed book were right (and I’m not sorry anymore). Quite simply, the average age in the room was well above 60 (hell, the median age was probably 70) and one of the three people (me included) that were under thirty was blogging while watching the Philly-Pitt final game online…
People occasionally even navigate to the extreme to be crazy couponers just to find the rush and also the excitement of having a great deal. If a person goes food shopping, look with regard to double low cost days. Additional discount shops sometimes actually offer cost matching. A few even provide senior discount rates or devotion programs. Numerous stores offer discount rates for getting store bank cards and provide reward kickbacks together with your monthly expenses. Check away early chicken specials which are for restricted hours. As well as who does not love the dollar offer or clearance area?
Michael Floyd, WR, Notre Dame
So I got new shoes and downloaded a couch to 5K program. Today was my first "run". I stretched. My body doesn't stretch like it used to. I walked a few minutes, per the programs directions. My shins started hurting. So did my ankles. I stopped and stretched some more. Started walking again. The program told me to run. Ha. I went back home and stretched some more.
Or in memories draped by the beneficent spider
Until 4 am?
On the trip down, we made it as far as South Carolina and just ran out of steam. So we stopped at a lovely Inn where we were absolutely charmed by the southern hospitality. (Fun story..my hubby, Brandon, LOVES Arby's, and since there was one across the street from the Inn, we indulged him and went there for dinner. When the lovely woman at the counter took his order, she asked for his name so she could call him when it was ready. When our food came out, she called out "Mr. Brandon, your food is ready". He was so tickled by the "Mr." he demanded we call him Mr. Brandon for the rest of the trip ;)
in the month of February and it looks like March will be
The trouble with Menahem Begin and Yitzhak Shamir was that they sounded as foreign and alien as their Palestinian rivals – and their suits were not as smart as Abba Eban’s had been.
Please feel free to post any comments that you have about any of our Alison's Pantry Products! I love to get your feedback, and I'm sure others will appreciate some good recommendations!
It started on Mnet Series last Friday (06/04/12) at 7.30pm so you still have time to start watching and get in on the fashion action.
Last week I made the comment on how I am going to try and take more "everyday" photos. To remind me to take more pictures I have been leaving my point and shoot camera out on our kitchen bar. Here are a few shots I have gotten over the last week...
Instead of following my advice the man tried to shoot at me and so I went to shoot him, but the trigger on my shotgun was hard to press & it got stuck like it was messed up; the man fired a shot at me, but then I finally shot him, but then two or three other men ran out of the room shooting at me.
We are fire we are stone
After fifteen minutes, they were beautifully lightly browned — but the yolks still looked suspiciously shiny, like they’d run all over the place as soon as you poked them.
when you came to live with us in '86, when you were dying of cancer, you helped mom and dad out numerous times financially. when you died, i believe you left a small amount of money. i was the happy recipient of your china, cookware, and items of furniture that lasted for years. you took the best care of everything you owned. i remember going to put on your favorite cardigan sweater, and finding a neatly folded tissue and a roll of certs........just like you had left them for me.
Fit for a King of dancing, upright in doorways eating jam.
When Milestone Ministries announced last week they would not renew their contract to run the homeless shelter this coming season, partly because of "micromanaging" by the Committee on Homelessness, the Select Board took direct aim at legislating the committee out of existence. Select Board Chair Stephanie O'Keeffe called Milestone's decision "A serious step backwards."
The solution to dealing with the global economic crisis, Klaus told the U.N. General Assembly, did not lie in "creating new governmental and supranational agencies, or in aiming at global governance of the world economy."
Picked it up at…. Got it from an ex-boyfriend..
She has no choice but to pick. As a Changeling, it’s her birthright. To Mac, it’s a birthchore. Like going to school with humans, interacting with humans, and pretending to be human during the pesky daylight hours.
Please also do be sure to check out the wealth of information that is available on the Infallibles from my dear friends and enablers:
This weekend, when local and international journalists arrived at the scene of the massacre 15 km from Umtali and less than 7 km from the Mozambique border, the mutilated and blood-stained bodies of three men, four women and five children - including a three-week-old baby - were lying as they had been found that morning.
Unfortunately, now that Labour have got what they want from these groups, they will abandon their causes like hot potatoes, only to show an interest again towards the end of February 2013!
The Hungry Pregnant co-worker
The whisper
Once you begin to learn about host plants, you can attract a wide variety of butterflies and moths to your gardens. WV DNR has put together a nice brochure with a sample garden plan and plants listed by what species of butterflies they attract. You can also visit their website here: http://www.wvdnr.gov/Wildlife/ButterflyGarden.shtm
Brown it will be.
Her right arm aches because she is sleeping on it, as if it is her pillow.
We look forward to seeing your projects!
Every once in a while I read a book and then feel very intimidated about reviewing it, because I’m afraid I just won’t be able to do it justice. This is one of those books.
You know who's really attractive? That guy (or girl) who thinks you're attractive. Isn't it the best thing to find out someone thinks you're attractive or likes you? I may not have noticed the guy before but suddenly I start to see him in a new light. Maybe I just admire his good taste in women. Or maybe it's the ego boost. Either way, I think it's interesting that just knowing someone likes you or thinks you're cute often makes you more interested in them.
They were doing it, first, because the program was so well-run and so user-friendly and so desirable that it had grown from three hundred participants to over a thousand. No people who were disabled wanted the usual for-profit programs to which the county was referring them. Second, the county was keeping the consumer-run programs under surveillance because they could. The for-profit programs were too cumbersome to monitor.
So a very simple card, but I love the two colours together and will definately have to play around with this background set a little more!
6 cups of mixed berries (strawberries- hulled, halved and sliced, Raspberries- whole, Blackberries- halved, Blueberries- whole, currants- whole) I used just strawberries
We got to Little Rock and had a nice lunch with both families - I spent the night with mom and dad and the next morning, mom, the girls and I drove up to Ft. Smith to spend the day with my sister. Jennifer had a whole day of train stuff planned for Abby's amusement. It was a lot of fun. We had lunch in an old train car turned diner, we played on and in the trains at the Trolly Museum, we rode the old trolly and then played at the park until it got dark and then we rode the Christmas Train through the park of lights. The whole day was awesome, and Abby was thoroughly thrilled with it all. Also, she was exhausted. We drove back that night
In a Boston Globe opinion, MIT grad student Zach Youngerman, wonders whether the lack of sidewalks creates a barrier to building trust, something essential for a healthy community. Without a sidewalk or other features that draw people out of their homes, there is little public interaction. Someone walking might then unintentionally prompt suspicion.
Perhaps the Administration realized that the inclusion of Heritage Keepers Abstinence Education on this select list would call into question its commitment to young people and their sexual health. Once again, they have succumbed to the political pressure of social conservatives and allowed the ideology of the right to prevail over the health and well-being of the nation’s youth. The Obama Administration’s endorsement of this abstinence-only-until marriage program runs in direct contradiction to its stated commitment to the health and well-being of young people and, quite possibly, its promise to uphold science and evidence.
“This man was thinking only of himself. He hoped to play it safe and protect himself from his hard master, but he was judged for his self-centeredness. We must not make excuses to avoid doing what God calls us to do. If God truly is our Master, we must obey willingly. Our time, abilities and money aren’t ours in the first place- we are caretakers, not owners.”
Returning to the Co-op’s boycott, now that the supermarket has gone one step further and has instituted what amounts to a secondary boycott of companies that do business with those boycotted settlements, besides the immorality and unethical behaviour of this action, it would seem that the supermarket has stepped onto shaky legal ground.
The Palestinian Call for Boycott Divestment and Sanctions
In order to ensure your notes are not only read, but also understood, follow these tips:
fact that the logistical situation of
As I walked the bike up a hill, I saw a skeleton flattened in the wet grass. A deer.
I had softserve ice-cream for breakfast (with sprinkles!!) and it was “game on” again (Also thanks to the free Wrigley’s gum that they kept handing out – minty fresh mouths make life better.)
God Bless, America – for the comedy, if nothing else. Here we go.
King: (To the guard) Leave us.
Following are some entries that I find illustrative of the whole process:
Dec. 10: THEY INVENTED CHRISTMAS (Featuring Victorian Christmas customs and paintings and yet another MeMe in which I answer 15 random holiday questions)
Hal: “We’re more Ceefax people.”
Three or four bars later we finally found her cozying up to some skinny bowlegged cowboy. She was drunk and so was the cowboy who had to be twenty years her senior. But the two of them were having a hell of time and when she introduced Brandon the old man threw an arm over my buddy's shoulder and pulled him in nearly as tight as he clutched my friend's mom.
Meet one deadline so far this spring,
However, I digress; after having spent a few winters here in the Midwest, I have come to understand that perhaps, such a song is not nearly as nonsensical as it seems. The text may at first strike one as overly romantic or perhaps even peculiar until one day I realized that the months of freezing temperatures and snow had ended and suddenly, the trees were covered in little green buds. Shortly thereafter, delicate blossoms began to emerge from tree branches and shortly thereafter, little buds suddenly changed into lush green leaves.
The Resolutions passed without any problems, and while it is nice to be asked, this is the sort of thing that is the second feature, the lower billed, less talked-about film. Nothing big on those ones, and no surprises.
Luckily, his foster mom was sensitive enough to this that she picked up on his passion and got this pooch to a training center to be tested as a search-and-rescue dog.
Such people should understand that when I or anyone else on the right complains about the evils of liberalism, we're not pretending to have interviewed every single idiot who opted for Hope and Change in 2008. We are referring to the leaders who speak for them, nincompoops like Obama, Reid, Pelosi, Napolitano, Waxman, Schumer, Kerry and Barney Frank, who pay lip service to democracy, but then label millions of their fellow Americans who happen to be engaged in the Tea Party movement -- which, by the way, is a far more demonstrably democratic group than the House or Senate -- as thugs, racists and brainless rabble.
At some point, I start feeling self-congratulatory.
It was not immediately clear which firms were being targeted, or whether President Robert Mugabe’s cash-strapped government planned to pay for the shares. Kasukuwere did not respond to requests for clarification.
Here's a close-up of the Dr. Seuss quote I used, which I did with a combination of paint, marker, scraps of the same Basic Grey pp, and bookpaper. I love how it turned out!
Strange Angels by Lili St. Crow
The overseer and main performer in the ritual is the High Priest. The High Priest and the priestly tribe must be represented, and have their transgressions atoned for, by an additional layer of sacrifice. This is due to their closer contact with the Tabernacle and its holy objects, as well as their greater responsibility in the community. A bull is sacrificed and the blood used during the purification ritual within the Tabernacle.
The physicians come, they come
Come on, Andrew, does it look like i'm three
discreetly refolds The New York Times.
Bolaño (brandishing the books triumphantly): Here they are.
Brice has had guests all day long. All sexy guys who look like they live at the gym. Ironically, several of them actually came over and talked to me while I was at the pool, sticking their heads over the fence.
All entries will be in the Comments section of this post. You can earn multiple entries by spreading the word about the giveaway - I want as many folks as possible to be able to get in on the action!
Six years ago strangers broke into Juliette’s house; she was home alone and only thirteen. She kept her eyes closed, praying that if she didn’t see anything, she wouldn’t be killed. No one harmed her. In fact, one of the thieves protected her. Now Juliette’s dreams are haunted by him.
This week's challenge is being sponsored by
The case for 15-year fixed-rate mortgages has never been stronger because, in the post-crisis market, the rate advantage over the 30-year has never been larger. The rate advantage is about 0.875 percent, whereas prior to the crisis, it was 0.375 percent to 0.5 percent.
5- Millstone Hill Radio Observatory Westford, Massachusetts
Spilling My Heart Out
I found a large package of 2012 Bowman singles in the mailbox once I got home, the result of a trade on the online forum I'm on. (I promise this will be my only Bowman post, as I'm sure most of you are sick of the set already.)
In addition to the awful list (the above incidents are only the worst, there are many more) of sexual freaks which Griffin holds close to his bosom, the full-of-sexual-innuendo texts which he sent to his (former) internet-attack dog Claudia Dalgleish, are also indicative of a mindset which actively encourages this sort of behaviour.
Don’t let it happen again. Syria means World War 3.
balloon
For the dress I start off with the darkest which is the China blue & just go around the edge to show where any shadowing would be.
- You were the one that offered to supply cask beer in 18G casks.
The midfield does have some quality in there but maybe they haven’t shown it enough this year. Sammy Clingan is another player with international experience and does have a very good passing range to his game. The problem has been that they have some good passers in their midfield but not enough goals from there, David Bell is another intelligent footballer and is good enough for the Championship but hasn’t scored, Gary Deegan is again another decent footballer but only has three goals.
I need to stand up, without losing my head. Fight without fear or anger, fight for who I am and what I want to be. But I am so scared. Scared to take the first step, towards being that manipulative bitch, who, don’t just survives.
This week's challenge from LGS is a really interesting one: use white plus one colour. Now, I used yellow, which looks fab in real life but is not so great when being photographed with white!! Didn't think of that, duh!
Remember the rule: ALL knitting (the craft) is made of stitches, but NOT ALL stitches are "knit" stitches. I know...it's a bit confusing...just remember that "knit" stitches are always performed from front to back...
As we are talking of Fringe performers here, chaos must have reigned all over the UK yesterday. I got phone calls from two comedians changing their show titles and wording and asking me what I thought. One of those calls was from American comedian Lewis Schaffer who, last year, managed to incorrectly bill his 7.00pm show in the Programme as a 17.00 show. What can you expect from a nation that calls mathematics “math” instead of “maths”?
There is no real way to know when this journey began. There is, of course, the failure of biology.
8. Count Your Blessings & Be Thankful -Reserve five minutes each day to walk around your house and pick two or three things you take for granted — the carpet, soap, a spice rack, a pencil — and really appreciate it. Think about how you use the object, how you benefit, how life would be different without it. By focusing on how this object makes your life better, you appreciate it more – you count your blessings. The pencil may add utility to your life, regardless. But only in recognizing that utility can it bring you satisfaction and value. You may also recognize that the object brings you no benefit … that it is just taking space and collecting dust and that you really should be giving it away (Getting rid of “clutter” has the added benefit that it lets you focus your appreciation on the items that really can bring you happiness).
He would make up at 12 midnight and chant the entire Bhagavad Gita every day as well as all the entire Rg Veda in the course of every fortnight.
Their daddy,
Copyblogger has the answers to that one because, frankly, I'm lazy and don't feel like converting it into my own words. Basically it comes down to structure and elegant writing. And learning lots about poker. I really want to play poker.
Can you list your top ten albums and singles to give us a bit more of a clue?
ooh's and aah's
Eastgate Shopping Centre
1-1 Ringing Beat 5:14
Additional apples, caramel topping and crushed cookies
Click the flier to go shopping!!
Maybe a song
Oliver Robbins is now a writer/director, mainly of short films.
JSB—It would be interesting to check those other points around the world and corroborate and see if there was anything else that happened elsewhere in the world at that time.
Before I go, I would like to wish all readers a Happy New Year! May the year 2012 be a blast for all of us!
The baby always wins.
A watch is something very personal to the wearer, and when you buy one you will already have a set style in mind. However, your lifestyle will play a large role in the watch that you choose. Here are a few ways that your lifestyle will affect your choice.
Standing in the middle bears great responsibility both to one's self and to the other's in the world around them. It provides for excursions across the gender borders to a world with vastly different perspectives and experiences. But always, while experiencing these realms, one need only look down to see that they are still silently connected to the world they were born into by an invisible gossamer leash. The rationalization of staying tied to that leash is the entanglement of reasons which brought us to the very spot one stands in now - and the responsibilities of the life led to this very point pull one back again to the other side.
Yeast S-04 Safale (yeast flocs hard, beer will be crystal clear in the glass)
Slick Ironside (Chairman), Founder of Ironside Industries
If you were allowed the use of a large billboard over a well traveled road, what would you put on the billboard?
Cold drops of water falling on your head, your arm from the priest’s aspergillum…
The first step toward exceptional listening is embracing silence. Just stop talking. Once you’re comfortable with silence you can step toward making others feel understood. Silence isn’t enough.
I would see their faces by my graveside
"Can't stand growly vocals". "All this doom stuff is too slow, it's boring". "Power metal is cheesy". Statements like that are so broad as to be nearly meaningless as actual qualifications of taste.
Proceed with frosting.
The railway intends to operate steam hauled passenger services between Ongar and North Weald, a diesel shuttle from North Weald into Epping Forest, and a heritage bus service connecting to Epping LUL Station and High Street.
“Why are you apologizing Chun?” he asked. Yoochun looks at Junsu with sadness in his eyes.
Goldstein says
And they have been super generous by allowing our DT to play with some of their brand new digi's. Thanks peeps!!
This year winter was in change, that was a gain.
Now for my family. We like to trade things up a bit sometimes, so today I made this recipe but added one teaspoon maple flavouring (Rawleighs only guys) put two dishers (size 16)* (8 TBS) of batter into each standard cupcake cup, I used these liners and had to do a tiny retro fit but hey, they worked. I sprinkled them with just a wee bit of chopped pecan bits. Banana Maple Pecan Muffin Cupcakes are born this October 5th 2011!
Frizzled Brussels Sprouts
Let me say from the outset that I don't like this movie because it is a "drug movie". I am not particularly drawn to drug movies (although I do like a few, but it's for their aesthetic quality, not because of the subject matter), but this movie is much more interesting than just a drug trip movie, because it actually follows the characters throughout their experiences, rather than just their experiences on drugs. A great scene in the movie is where the crew takes the train out to the hills, and instead of being happy with being out of the city, they are all pissed off because there's nothing to do there. What this movie lacks in real character development, it makes up for in wit.
Then I got even more excited when the desire to revise kicked in full gear, after a much needed breather, and I started work, cutting here, adding there. I was making slow but steady progress when I saw something interesting.
Here's the blurb:
Isn't that true of most everything in life? I mean, the hardest part being the "letting go." This student said, "Once I let go and just did it I was fine, but I was scared to let go." It made me think of all those big changes that lie before us...for many these days it means facing unemployment and finding a new job; for some it's facing retirement; for others it's moving to a new town or new house; for some it means letting go of some emotional pain...perhaps a grudge...the letting go means forgiving someone...or even forgiving self for a mistake or a regret; maybe for some it means just letting go of what they THINK should be happening in their lives and just being o.k. with where they are and focusing on their blessings. The "letting go" can be the hardest part. And that's exactly where God is...in the letting go. The longer and harder we hold on to that "pole" the harder the journey becomes, the more anguish we create...the pole becomes a crutch...the pole becomes NOT our safe place, but our obsticle. God is waiting for us to LET GO and reach out...experience FAITH...embrace what looks impossible...TRUST that He is with us and it will all be fine. GOD is our "spotter" - He's holding our life-line...He's going to make sure that all will turn out just the way it should. Once we let go of our proverbial poles and just do what we need to do, we too will find that it all looked scarrier than it actually was. Be aware of your blessings today and trust that you are exactly where should be...for today. Let go of what you need to let go of and feel God's peace...today.
It did the job, but it just didn't look good to me.
What's relevant?
I decided to brave West London's late night streets to get meself some air. Maybe some inspiration for my words to? It comes from everywhere.
Regardless of what one thinks of Hank Williams Jr., politically, Hank is a musical national treasure. After all, of the Williams boys (Hank Williams Jr. and Hank Williams III), Hank is the most commercially successful heir to the throne of Hank Williams Sr. Whether one is looking to expand his/her conception of country music or just music, in general, “Hank Williams Jr: Greatest Hits Vol. 1 is a valuable piece of Americana.
bouncy castles
The word ‘depression’ indicates a ‘low spot’. A place of emptiness. A condition of lack.
Then what are we left with? One of China’s better employers, that’s right better employers. Whilst working life is definitely hard at Foxconn, with employees working 6 days a week and often for 12-14 hours a day, that’s true of almost any Chinese factory (in fact in many busy factories – it’s unlikely that workers even get a day off a week).
The same way that you are subject to the Lord (obedient to His Word) you have to be subject to your husband. If your husband asks you to do something contrary to the Word of God then you are not to obey or submit.
I'm not going to delay or postpone this any further. It's time for me to be open. For the past few weeks I have been slipping into a deep antepartum depression.
- miia, switzerland, 21/2/2012 09:05
The only problem I could really have had with the book is the fact that, at times I had to read passages over again to fully grasp where we were and what was going on; particularly those passages that occurred shortly after Rumbold became human again, where the scenes jump forward at an awkward pace (but then again, so does the prince). Perhaps it was just me. It’s a minor complaint, though, since I’ve had to do this with other highly rated books, as well.
(Unlike the Wall Street Journal, I have not divided these books by sex. Many of these books can be equally enjoyed by boys or girls.)
To give you a brief summary...(not including the usual daily requirements, and for a baby of food/play/bathe/bottle/sleep)
One of the greatest challenges for men is to realize, as Paul wrote in Colossians 3:11:
I walk with you for a minute, for a moment for a lifetime and never tire of your company.
Stand back and look! Look to the word. Because in all its power, in all those visitations and visions we will never find this process defined for us in the bible. We will never find an example or story or teaching that requires us to visit our past or find a root for our troubles.
incorruptible, and liveth and abideth for ever in the life that is in Christ
I would recommend this book to those interested in understanding what we can learn from the mistakes of our recent history, although, the books Andrews references in his bibliography might be a more thorough resource.
Upon College Graduation, an unfinished essay
At the office until 7. By the time I had dinner and got back to the hotel, I was glassy-eyed and fading. I sat at my computer, attempting to get some writing and emails out, but had to unplug and crawl into bed with my book and cat.
I’ll report back.
Well, Miami is about as 'diverse and inclusive' (at least if you take that to mean 'lacking in White people') as it gets while still being part of the United States, so this is not surprising.
Cut some elastic the size of your child's waist. Mine was 18" for a skinny 2year old. Take one end of it and attach a safety pin. Start pushing the pin and elastic through your casing. You will probably want to safety pin the other end to your skirt so you don't lose it.
Matthew and I practiced for the play. We had no lines. There was a voice over, and all we had to do was to walk from one part of the stage to the next. We were arm in arm, and I was holding a fake baby. It was a doll that I borrowed from my cousin. It wasn’t a cute doll. It looked like a Tiyanak. So much for sweet baby Jesus.
It said its own investigations “are now at an advanced stage” and “are expected to be completed in the near future”.
Even this week, it became clear that the Government is happy to consider letting a Russian firm, the one behind the Chernobyl accident, run some of Britain’s next generation of nuclear power stations. In fact, to date, we’ve sold off more than half our assets to foreign owners.
I've been introduced to some new apps for my iphone. They are Dailyburn and Log your run. I have been trying to eat better and do some exercising. I have a friend who swears my Log your run. She post her results every night on facebook. So now I'm going to do the same. I like the friendly competition, and it makes me get up a move. Dailyburn you can upload everything you have eaten and also your exercising. It tells you how many calories you have left for the day. It also has great workouts you can do.
Dr Thebe Medupe, a South African astrophysicist who grew up in a poor village outside Mmabatho, without electricity, lights or television.
a couple shoulder shrugs
bond and personal relationship with God. His soul yearns for the love of God, not
The document contains a brief description of the crime scene: the deceased is a woman, Angelica Myrtis, 34 years old. She was found outside the diner where she was a waitress. Discovered by the diner’s cook, Lester Yerev, when she briefly exited the diner and did not return. Cause of death appears to be stabbing, followed by decapitation and dismemberment. The casefile was flagged by the Bureau because of the gruesome nature of death in addition to reports of “strange marks” written with the deceased’s blood.
“Right,” I said, smirking to myself. Only a week after Frank’s attack and disappearance, I was not ready to acquiesce to the magickal abilities of a dirty, worn doll that may have marched out of its own grave. I still believed that Marlene had probably done something she shouldn’t have, and just didn’t fess up. I grabbed my big, quilted purse and climbed out of the car. Marlene jammed the notebook back in her purse, and followed me.
What the NYPD is doing is evil and it must be stopped. They are merely armed thugs.
These are a few of my favorite blogs, so "tag" you are it!
I'm currently teaching my 7th week out of 13 weeks and our time together is limited. A lot of our time together is during the hour drive home. I've tried to make that our music time introducing you to all different types of music. Somedays I even make that story time and we listen to Harry Potter. I miss you a lot during the day. Daddy says I have the best part... I get to pick you up and see your happy face. He gets the tears and crying when he drops you off. All I know is I look at photos of you everyday when I teach and wish I was with you instead.
But we soon ran low on cigarettes
Time to turn back and descend the stair
Course, it was worth every penny of it......see #12! lol
Our tradition holds that RSi atharvan discovered the fire. He found the way by which fire could be produced with araNi sticks and that he systematized it in a way that the other rishis could easily replicate this process. Then, our tradition tells us that Viswamitra विश्वामित्र learned it and introduced this mechanism for quickly starting up this fire into the Rg Veda. See : Atharvan discovered the fire. Viswamitra Institutionalised it
After leaving education, I worked with the Citizens Advice Bureau service for many years. I loved how any member of the public could come in and get support with any issue. Many people thought that the CAB was part of the Government for some reason but nope, they were and are a charity doing rather fabulous things day in and day out. Helping clients with debt, welfare benefits, housing, employment, family and other issues. If you want my big tip on life, always check out your rights and responsibilities with the CAB every time life throws a little change your way. It is FREE and confidential.
I had a few things working against me when I was growing up (who didn’t?). I was a tall, strong girl, from a poor family, who desperately wanted to be loved and accepted. These are all the ingredients for social pariahism. I was too “boyish” compared to many girls in my town, but I was still too much of a girl to hang with the boys. I envied the clean, stylish clothes of my peers when mine smelled of cigarettes and came from the discount store. Perhaps all of this could have been overcome if I didn’t desperately latch on to any peer that showed me the slightest bit of attention. Here’s a tip: that shit ain’t cool. Kids can smell fear and desperation better than a pack of wolves. The latter are also kinder.
09 - The Harp Jam 12:18
Jeff and I need to get on the ball and mark our territory too. One good belly laugh or sneeze and I might be the next one!
Back to the Maya and their concept of the Time spiral.
1088. Dinner Plate @ the Mundy Household (Charlotte, NC) 6:14 p.m.
Do you think that I choose to be out of control?
The Hanning piece notes that Natalie Rowe’s interview with the Aussie BBC (the ABC network) is about to be aired – but that a UK broadcasting source asks, “Why put someone forward for a job, as Osborne did, when you know what a disservice they have done you?”
I have loads of colours of gingham and am hoping to get my little mitts on some polka dots tomorrow :c)
According to Capital Economics, the report is mixed for the nation’s households. The economics firm found real personal disposable incomes rose only 0.4%.
In 2007 Beunka’s attorney at appeal, Stephen Evans, presented ten points of error in his client’s criminal case. The court voted 9 to 0 that the objections held no merit. The court affirmed both the trial court’s judgment and the sentence of death.
I've just started getting back to Noodle's room after the Holidays and the shock of my Dad's health scare. I painted the ceiling and Zuddy is working on the baseboards.
Bane sounds stilted instead of garbled. I’ve enjoyed Bane as a comics character in recent years, particularly as a demented father figure among younger villains in Gail Simone’s unfairly canceled Secret Six. There, he was well-spoken and had a twisted sense of honor that spurred him into the most unpredictable decisions in any given situation. In this trailer, his two lines wouldn’t sound out of place in any other Batman film or TV show. Any of them.
Pearl Jam - Sonic Reducer
In a bizarre courtroom twist, Purnell called former Wimbledon footballer John Fashanu, now Nigeria’s ambassador for sports and tourism, as a character witness.
No, not THAT first time! My first time as a SOLSC writer. :)
So the next time you have a rough time, celebrate it and know that it is just helping you to be successful.
Shark Liver Oil – Oil from shark livers, etc. In cosmetics, moisturizers, hair dyes, surface-active agents. Used in lubricating creams and lotions. Derivatives: Squalane, Squalene. Alternatives: vegetable oils. Alternatives: vegetable emollients such as olive oil, wheat germ oil, rice bran oil, etc.
I printed off the balloon, flowers and grass and then cut them out. I added a bit of inking to the balloon and some stickles to the flower to add a bit of dimension. The DP is also from GallimaufryUK. I added a bit of fibre to accent the grass and the sky and some little letters that were given to me in a swap. I am looking forward to seeing your entries into this week challenge, it runs until June 12th so you have lots of time to enter!
When to use: Immediately after a talking head makes an outlandish prediction. Lee Corso will get some mileage out of this one.
With The Stars,” dissing this or
of change
Labeling something as tradition, does not automatically justify it. And if the dolphin drive hunts are a tradition in Taiji and Japan, how come the Japanese people and the residents of Taiji do not know about it? In the documentary The Cove, Ric O’Barry and Louie Psihoyos ask random people on the street in Taiji, if they know about the dolphin drive hunts that happen every year from September through March, and that people actually eat dolphin meat in their country. Some people say that they do not look at dolphins as food, and that dolphins are rather something that they enjoy watching. Most of the people asked did not know that the dolphin hunts occur in Taiji or that dolphin meat is distributed in their supermarkets and restaurants, and they were shocked when given this information.
(We're shooting for an October 1st release.)
One thing you do not do is this…
I used to share a small glass of Mackeson's stout with my grandfather (many years before I entered my teens), the result being I manage to drink as an adult without throwing up in railway carriages, dropping my trousers, passing out, assaulting anyone or even putting my feet up on seats on the journey home!
FALL - an unintentional change in position resulting in coming to rest on the ground or a lower level
Sangor had been a captive of the Rats. Maybe they turned him. Maybe his wife had persuaded him to betray his species.
ANZAC stands for the Australian and New Zealand Army Corps.
She passed away this early morning, just after two o’clock.
I hope you like the selection. Be sure to check out other items by the featured sellers- they all have a great inventory. Have a fabulous day, readers, and don't forget to get Dad something really cool this year!
The Wooly Lousewort (P. Kanei subsp. Kanei) is the first to appear in the spring, often starting to grow in early June when much of the ground is still covered with snow. It isn’t uncommon to find the first ones of the season blooming in a small patch of tundra surrounded by snow, a bit of pink in a world of white. To protect itself from the freezing temperatures and cold winds it has developed a covering of dense wool, and before it starts to bloom, it looks so different it could be mistaken for a different plant. This plant also has the largest tap root of the four and it is good to eat cooked or raw, a good source of starch, and the taste is similar to that of a sweet potato. It grows 15-20cm/6-8 inches tall from a thick yellow taproot with rose colored corolla.
Where: Home / BORZONE!
7. Unforgiveness comes when we have been forced to suffer the soul wounds of abuse, neglect, and rejection in silence.
‘Yeah, I guess I’ll need more lessons from Edward down at the shop.’
It wasn't much of a job. But at the time, Jesse didn't think he was much of a person.
"Are you mad?" Rel couldn't keep the anger from his voice. "How are we going to run like this?" Normal procedure would be to run hard at the Gate and dive head-long through it, thus arriving vertically out of the floor on the other side. But even if Rissad's leg could stand the landing, there was no way they could move fast enough to manage the dive. Even without Rissad, Rel wasn't sure he could manage it past his current robe of aches.
-Diapers: size 4
Momma's patience is tested. (and probably Daddy's too ;)
Gently add the 3 cups of hot water and stir continuously for 4-5 mins to avoid forming lumps and add salt.
First, they would notice that there are hordes of aliens in all British cities who are not British and never will be. Millions of immigrants from Africa, Pakistan, India, China, Vietnam, Poland, Romania, The Caribbean, all combining to introduce cultures and traditions tolerated and regarded as equal – if not superior – to the British culture.
In the God damn America of Barack Obama, the poor people that Obama promised his policies would save are (of course) unable to buy a house while watching their rents skyrocket.
as a writer, this makes me sad.
Cuando Adán sondeó y Eva se revolvió,
Leeteuk also said, “Super Junior couldn’t make a hit without me” and “I supported Eunhyuk a lot,” and talked about his plan for marriage. It will air on May 3.
“Conrgoblin, whatever are you talking about? How could you have a triumph on wordpress?”
The main reason, though was that most times I don’t feel like I’m a very good book blogger. I’m finding it harder and harder each review to really put into words my feelings, besides “I liked it, you should read it.” And, when you read a book that you know you should love and you were just meh about it, it’s hard to review. There’s also the fact that I am so frigging behind on review books it isn’t even funny. I hate to admit this, but I have books from 2009 that I requested and haven’t read yet. I mean, I ASKED for the books. The publisher took the time AND the money to send them to me, fully believing that I would review them, and hopefully in a timely manner. But I’ve found that I don’t do well with schedules when it comes to reading. I’m more of a “grab a book that appeals to me” and read it kinda reader. I have every intention of reader my backlog of review books. But when I look at the shelf, I get panicky and anxious. And I feel horrible and like a failure that I haven’t read them yet. Which makes me not want to read them. It’s a horrible cycle to be stuck in.
What is an Esthetician?
It's cavernous inside and not too exciting on the decor front and their separate bar area is definitely a little seedy, BUT.... I still liked it.
In solidarity with Occupy Wall Street, Occupy Norfolk, and Occupy Virginia Beach the Blue Scholar Blog is committed to taking a stand against Wall Street and government corruption.
2. Pour thick yogurt into large bowl, and wisk lightly.
What would it be like to move like that?
I am pretty sure that Baby L outgrew my pelvis weeks ago. She seems still to be attempting to backstroke through her previously roomy environment, which causes a lot of doubling over on my part. And, you know, having the breath knocked out of me mid-sentence. And nausea.
Off to go study more. Someone please come take my finals for me this week so I can just relax…
the patience . . . . . . .? ? ?
So, that was lesson number one. For me. But school wasn't over. There was more to learn...
Contour Showers, one of the UK’s leading manufacturers and suppliers of shower solutions for the elderly and less able, have applied its 50 years’ experience to further develop the Prinia range of shower tray designed specifically for use on an unbreachable bathroom floor installation when a shower waste pump cannot be used.
· Muscle Aches, Fatigue and Tension
We started by going to a really nice little cafe called Oeuf. Yummy – the pictures show the make your own salad, omlettes curry chicken, and seafood daria. It was really good. Then we went back to Jared’s place and had birthday cake! Beautiful, Miyuki turned 25 yesterday. We got into Miyuki’s car and went to the Omatsugongen cat shrine (in Kamodani). I really did try to restrain myself in the picture taking there since I’ve already posted so many from my first visit. But the cat statues are so cute and the whole area is so green and beautiful. This is the bright green that I’ve really missed living in CA. It’s the green of the east coast. I love the interesting moss and rock clinging plants as well.
This whole genre of thought experiments comes together as the “absent qualia” argument. The argument is that complete functional descriptions fail to capture the quality of experience just as utterly as complete physical descriptions do. One of the biggest successes in philosophy of mind in recent years has been the work of David Chalmers, who argued in The Conscious Mind that, faced with the problem of qualia, we have no choice but to concede that materialism is false and that reality includes at least two kinds of properties, physical properties and phenomenal ones.
3. "Let's Go Crazy" by Prince and the Revolution.
The crowd manufacturing cycle will radically upset the present chain of invention, manufacture, distribution, and retail of goods. 3D printing favors the creation of complex and relatively small items, in small or individual print runs. 3D printers, though far slower per item than an injection molding, have no initial mold cost to depreciate, which means they are suited to once-off or short run productions. Injection molding a complex item can also require costly separate molds and assembly of several discrete components. In contrast, 3D printing can build such an item as a single assembly, even if it contains a mix of materials. Fixtures for fighter jets that once were manufactured as assemblies of many different parts are now 3D printed by the firm 3D Systems as a single part, reducing tooling cost, materials waste, and object weight. As 3D printing technology improves it may be able to print objects that are currently impossible to manufacture.
I was always the "older" sister. As the "older" sibling, I am protective of my younger brother...but, he is protective of his sister as well. We were 5 1/2 years apart, and growing up we were close...but, lets face it...during the teenage years he was hitting the years where it was "fun" to tease and "bother" his older sister. There were some ahem "great times" during those years (sarcastically)!!!
So I gave RB a crash course in pacing, and I'm not sure how much of it sunk in. So I told her walk breaks were ok, that lots of people walk, that I ran 26 miles in a race and I walked. We walked. And we jogged, and she actually had a pretty quick jogging pace too. And then, without warning, we sprinted!! So much for pacing. I darted behind her, ducking through people and apologizing....aaannnddd....WALK. LB was struck by the number of people ahead of us, and I pointed out the number of people behind us, too, and how finishing, not winning, was the goal. I race all the time, I told her, and I NEVER win but I'm happy to do my best. I think it worked. She said, "Just don't quit!" and I firmly agreed.
I covered a notecard with some pretty paper from Lawn Fawn. The oval die cut was stamped and clear embossed with the Dot Flower Pattern background stamp and inked with some Mustard Seed. Here is the funny part: I wanted the edge to be a light blue, so I used some Broken China....of course....yellow and blue make GREEN! But I decided to leave it like that as it made a really pretty shade of geen.
Mix banana, sugar, eggs, milk and oil in a large bowl.
For non-geeks and those of us just wondering what this world is coming to, let me say that the mom, Rachel Wilder, is only doing this because she believes that her high tech hovering will keep her son “safe.”
Digital Drawing and Painting
I took off some time this weekend to play Secret World (MMO) and think its good. It'll be released in June. Also during the weekend I was fill out some orders for the first issue of The Manor and talking to a couple people about the second. And jotting down ideas for future issues. I've got a mock cover made for the second issue made and more than half of the second issue is written I just need to edit it. Boy does it need it.
Big Ten officials discussed a proposal that would pay athletes to help cover living expenses on top of their scholarships during the league’s spring meetings this week…
“But,” the boy said, an indolent smile playing on the corner of his mouth, “you are not my Lord. My lord is yonder.” The boy gestured out into the darkness.
All his arguments were in vain. When called upon to take an oath of loyalty to the Confederacy he refused:
Hey honey, i love you berry much, its been a super long day. i pretty much just got off and we have to wake up super early in the morning so im just going to write you this and head to bed i love you dearly avery, i think about you all the time. it feels like to me that i've been gone forever already, but i haven't. i try not to even to think about how much longer i have because it seems so far away, but we'll make it avery. i know we will. i love you avery walser i do, all the way down to my soul. you and only you, you are it for me. i love you, you're so sexy and hot its wonderful, i love it. i would love to say that i will come back the same man, but i can already tell that i wont. i love you and i hope you can love me and still love me no matter what i come back as. i love you avery, my wife, my one and only, my true love and my best friend. i love you baby to the moon and back, forever and always, im yours and i hope you stay mine, i love you and ill try and talk to you tomorrow when we get back, i love you honey. so so much and i miss you very, very bad.
The frosting will crust over if you leave it overnight in the fridge. But warm it up for 15 seconds in the microwave and it's SO amazing. Give this a try, it'll be a new favorite holiday dessert!
Next month’s Kro 2 whisky tasting will be hosted by Compass Box who are an independent Scotch whisky company. On offer will be Great King Street, Spice Tree, Hedonism, The Peat Monster and Orangerie. 5 whiskies I’ve never tried, but can’t wait to taste!
It's about cultivating a sense of responsibility - that you have a duty to report the world without bias. That you remain objective, no matter how deep into the morass or private hell you go.
HAMUUL: Mmhmm.
For this week’s challenge, you have to write a letter of apology in exactly 33 words. Addresses, salutations, closings, etc. (should you wish to include them) do not count in the 33 words.
I am not 100% convinced that the government is going to turn Ofsted's 'recommendation' into a government 'request' or 'requirement'. As you might imagine, I tried as passionately as I could to put the case for the government to ask this of schools, on the basis that the consequence of doing so would benefit all pupils everywhere but in particular those from homes where there are no books.
2/3 yd lightweight fusible interfacing (woven or non-woven)
I finally did find it, but I couldn't open up.
Finally, one should not discount the mental benefit of putting on a pair of compression socks. As soon as a slip into the socks, I feel like I’ve turned into a superhero, only instead of a cape it’s knee high socks. Compression socks at the moment conjures the image of elite athletes, Olympians, marathon champions. Somehow, by putting on a pair of compression socks, we aspire to be like them. And so it gave me a mental boost that, I think, helped me to keep going.
But I was reluctant to give up all intercourse with the human race in favor of my dogs, so I analyzed the problem. And when I was done, the finger of blame pointed at Wolfie. Lexi was too old and slow in her greetings to upset anyone. Bisou was more annoyance than threat, and I could always pick her up in my arms and spare the guest. But I absolutely had to get Wolfie under control.
11. SeaWorld
Another area that I found myself making when
My no.1 rule is: carefully read the labels or nutritional information provided and simply avoid the sugar where at all possible. The rest will take care of itself.
It is a stream that changes character constantly from urban sterility to touches of rural trees and vegetation. From new concrete pathways and walls of today, to rocks that cross the stream as bridges and have seen centuries behind them. From bare concrete-faced walls to hanging natural, living wall cover that reflects the colours of autumn.
I don’t remember all of the details, and to be honest I was a teenage girl with hurt and hormones and insecurity coursing through my veins and now I wonder how much those things could have tainted my perspective, but what I do remember is this:
I finished my Masters! Yeah ME!
On this day, we also got a tour of the entire Hannah's Hope orphanage. Wass, our driver, gave us an amazing tour. He has such a vibrant personality, and gets along with everyone he crosses paths with. And he LOVES those children. It was especially sweet for us to see he had pictures of our boys on his phone. David wrapped up P in the Moby wrap, and he slept through the whole tour. W on the other hand, enjoyed every moment of the tour wide awake in my arms. Which was fine with me too :) Here are some pictures of the orphanage:
Strength: Tony Bennett is his father’s son. Just like Dick Bennett, Tony preaches defense to his teams and this Virginia team is no different. The Cavaliers hold teams to 39.6 percent shooting and 53.7 points per game. They make it difficult to run any kind of offense against them. They’re physical and will challenge everything. This is definitely a team that’s a pain to play.
Yet I needed this echo to remind me today.
There are a lot of "favorites" on my list of authors. Some of these authors write one flaming meteor of a book and are never able to duplicate this glory and you wonder where their muse is hiding. Others manage to write many wonderful stories. Years ago, a dear friend from my college days, Tim, introduced me to the author, Pat Conroy.
A small victory to be sure, but I think an important one; it’s another stone in the growing pile which will form the foundation of sex worker rights in the United States.
“I noticed you have my first name and my middle one in your phone,” Mr. T said.
"What about when the Internet explodes? Do you have your blog saved somewhere?"
See, for this year’s screnzy, I decided to do something totally different, new, and exciting as an experiment to explore where I’d never gone before.
I wouldn’t even be having this rant-ish-type conversation with myself/the internet/wordpress right now if it wasn’t for the fact that I now write for Teen Skepchick, where the visual editor is already in place.
There are MANY more of these examples of which I have found, there's a lot more. Things like this raise suspicion to me. I'm not scamming you guys I swear. I'm not doing this for the money, and there is NO money involved. I don't have much more time to invest in this right now, but on my freetime I'm willing to get a microscope and compare these lenses to prove my point. This is what I mean by "fake."
Thanks again
cheddar cheese (2 cups shredded)
10 Sad Song
By the way, I speak French because I went to a language school to learn French for 6 months in Washington, D.C. with my husband before we went to Senegal for his job assignment. I felt comfortable sending my daughter there for this reason. It’s been 5 years since I had spoken French, so my French has gotten really rusty, but speaking with my friend, Anne-Marie, here helped me revive my French. I love it.
Well, the first thing that we must do to build a community is just that, build community amongst ourselves. Too often I see the pagan and heathen communities online fractured into different factions, while in person, well they're almost as volatile as the Christians as far as keeping groups together. You end up with a bunch of very small, very ideological groups that can't stand each other because of drama and such. Maybe we need to wait until these fractured communities grow large enough to sustain themselves. I don't think we do.
Everyone else who donated...I have some happy mail to send you too!
While this dress probably doesn’t have any of those features, it did seem to convert my breasts into Lara Croft-like wireframes. I suppose that’s a score for the men. Otherwise, I fear that patters might do to men what they do to the eye. Confuse.
(4) Ringback tones eclipse every other form of music monetization – combined.
This grumpy little cat was on LOLCATS ages ago and I've kept her on my desktop ever since. It's not so much that I acknowledge the state of mind in myself, although I do, but that it takes me right back to work and certain colleagues.
I am holy. Lev. 11:44
Well, it sounds like the address file has found a wonderful home. Thankyou to everyone who entered my giveaway, truly I wish that I had a little something to send to each and everyone of you. But I will be having more giveaways soon, as I have a few "extra" address files, and some other items to find good homes for as well, so keep in touch!
In the report, Lam specifically addresses the sex knowledge and sources of sex knowledge as areas for concern among educators. The main source of secondary schools students’ sex knowledge is the newspapers (54.1%) followed by TV and biology classes in school. More than 78% of students report reading pornographic material and 47.9% report watching pornographic videos, with 17.2% consumers of pornographic telephone lines. Since families in Hong Kong still consider sexuality a taboo subject, less than 20% of students speak to their parents about sex. Extrapolating on the perceptions and attitudes data, students acquiring knowledge from the mass media may have very limited knowledge about atypical gender identities and hold very negative views of GID/TG or any on-normative gender identity.
(3) Palestinians who don’t like having “limited voting power” can move to Jordan.
20.Who Remembers Davey Graham? (unknown)
Tom Tom Club Wordy rappinghood AUS
Instead she just went into the hall and sprawled out on the floor not helping the widespread rumors that she is a stage five clinger. She just needs to drug her parents and move to California. It’s actually just like the movie Son-In-Law. Holy shit, Pauly Shore reference.
Paper - Bella Blvd. Spring Flings & Easter Things Line: Mom's Bouquet, Cardstock Aqua, Dark Aqua, White
If you know me you are laughing your head off right about now because you know how totally true this is. My house is a mess, I rarely take care of my appearance, I occasionally swear in front of my children and have been known to yell. These are just the tip of the iceberg when it comes to my list of flaws and I am ok with it. Yes I can be judgemental, but if you say you're not then you are lying. I screw up sometimes and burn an entire cookie sheet full of roasted chickpeas or forget what you told me five minutes ago, but I can deal with that.
I have never written a blog before, and I don't normally like to share my problems, successes, or personal life with anyone, so this will be a journey for all. I will eventually fill in the blanks, and get into my history, where I'm at, where I came from and where I'm going. I basically want an outlet to voice my feelings, and thoughts about what has become a life long struggle, and war to save my own life from the grips of a horrible addiction to alcohol, cocaine, pills, weed, and eventually heroin, and everything in between. Not necessarily in that order, but you get it?
Jaleel White (Urkel) tried to Move like Jagger… but he didnt know who he was. Um. Youtube it. In the same way half of America had to Google your name. Since his first dance he’s been entertaining, but mediocre at best.
Adrenalize signed by Scantraxx Recordz
At some point, however, the evidence of a highly disturbed personality shows through, especially once the psychopath is no longer invested in a given victim and thus no longer makes a significant effort to keep his mask on. Then total denial is no longer possible. The floodgates of reality suddenly burst open and a whole slew of inconsistencies, downright lies, manipulations, criticism and emotional abuse flows through to the surface of our consciousness.
2 years since I started my account.
This morning Anna and I were assigned to Internal Medicine where we saw a total of 4 patients. One had a urinary tract infection that was easily taken care of with antibiotics. The others all had a sickness called chagas which is a parasite infection. It comes from a fly common around here called the "kissing fly", it bites it's victim and deficates at the same time. When the person itches the bite they rub the feces which containes the parasite into the bite and into thier body. It effects many parts of the body including the heart, stomach and lungs. They have no cure here, so the people just live with it until it consumes them. Very sad, and it is quite common around here because the fly lives in the bricks they commonly make houses out of.
He sees you. All of your effort, your service, your laying down of self, your sacrificial giving, your stepping out in faith, your steady faithfulness, your lack of sleep, your soul emptied out.
· Position is based in Hyderabad
Florian: I spent 4 months filming with the IMAX crew and have spent a total of 18 months in the Arctic over the past 10 years on several different exhibitions. I have been to Alaska, Canada and Norway.
…for the human reality may be compared to a seed. If we sow the seed, a mighty tree appears from it. The virtues of the seed are revealed in the tree; it puts forth branches, leaves, blossoms, and produces fruits. All these virtues were hidden and potential in the seed. Through the blessing and bounty of cultivation these virtues became apparent. (2)
Close your eyes and imagine that you are currently living about 6,000 miles from home. While you are there, someone tells you that you need to try to decide where exactly you are going to live for at least the next 3-4 years if not the next 5-10 years when you return home. Then they tell you that you can only choose 10-12 cities in the entire United States...and one of those cities is where you must spend the next couple years of your life. Do you feel the panic begin to set in? Increased heart rate...shortened breath...sweaty palms. This is where I find myself.
I still have the urges to light up at certain times of the day. I want to smoke when I wake up, when I drive (especially here in New Jersey – there is a reason why auto insurance is higher in New Jersey than in any other state – people here don’t know how to drive!) I also want to smoke when writing blog entries. (This is why I haven’t written in a few days.)
So then, what’s the big deal with the TAIL transaction if Treasury has, as it claims this morning, “unequivocally agreed” to NAMA’s requirements. The Memorandum of Understanding referred to above was signed in December 2010 – 14 months ago – so why is TAIL even an issue now? Or is it the case that although the MoU has been agreed, that Treasury hasn’t – 14 months later – complied with its requirements in terms of providing NAMA with security and undertakings in respect of the TAIL transaction, this after NAMA has advanced €103m to what seems like a deeply insolvent company. And if that is the case, was TCT being entirely frank in the implication of its statement which was that it was at one with NAMA in respect of the TAIL transaction.
Another reported in 2009 that the drug interdiction specialist had received a tongue-lashing from five top Interior Ministry officers at a meeting to discuss an alleged U.S. Coast Guard violation of Cuban waters during the emergency assistance of a U.S.-registered sailboat.
The seared tataki, served Japanese style with onions in a ponzu sauce, was also good in a different way. The sear obviously gave it more flavor and bite, but you also appreciated the flavor of the wagyu a bit less. I honestly don’t know which I prefer, but I do know I now want to try their steak tartare as well.
13 The Moma Dance
Main attraction of these bundles is monthly package that offers 1 GB download limit and is charged at Rs. 149.99 (no taxes applies). Keep reading to know further.
Scores out of 10:
One cable noted that a top Interior Ministry counter-drug official had complained that U.S. cooperation on drug interdictions was “often one-sided” and that Cuba wanted to work more closely with U.S. officials in sharing information about trafficking in the region.
Your admired bold of all time:
They’re dense little berries – more of a bite than a blueberry or a grape, and with an interesting flavor – a little like a cherry tomato mixed with pineapple or mango. Some berries were a little bitter, but most of them were nicely sweet.
See the difference in the red with the stain on it?
Workout Schedule:
Long story short, We both seemed to be a little more optimistic about Us. I’m still cautious about assuming We’re making any progress, but I can see the possibility of progress. Anyway, We went to bed at the same time as each other (which although it is not rare, it’s not the norm either) and We ended up having a cuddle in bed. Nothing more. No snogging. No petting. And no sex. Just a cuddle.
influence on what came to be known as “Thrash Metal,”
This morning I kept my children home for an extra hour and a half. We sprawled on the rug when we should have been brushing our teeth, and played tent under the blankets when we should have been dressed and ready to go. We watched Cat in the Hat and SuperWhy. I let them crawl over me and eat Nutella with a spoon and play with the iphone. We constructed a wild animal diorama. I read my son Duck in the Truck for the first time and three more times. Helen reviewed yesterday's artwork in detail. It's 12:15 now, and though I have to read at the Graduate Center at 6:30 today, and to work on my thesis for a fast approaching deadline, I'm about to call my husband to see if he wants to meet for sushi at Gen.
My 2002 contract with Random House for the anthology Sit-Down Comedy specified a 50% royalty on any future e-book version. A fortnight ago, they sent me a letter saying they want to only pay 25% instead of 50% on any eBook version because the contracted 50% royalty rate “was arrived at before the UK eBook market had begun to develop and before the extent of our digital investment was known. Since this royalty was agreed, the eBook market has moved on greatly but, in the process, we have found that 50% of net revenues is no longer viable”.
"And what exactly happened last weekend?" V asked.
LADIES OF THE HOUSE
My goal was to landscape this area before winter hit, but the selection of plants aren't great right now, so I think I may wait until the spring.
I also did not want my pear just floating in space so grounded it on a simple "table top". I wanted the pear to pop out so I added the slight shadowing.
I ended up selling an old fan, 2 bathroom shelves, a tile cutter, and some clothes, for $10.50. That was more money than I came with :) And after next week, the stuff that doesn't sell is getting donated. Adela sold the most (she had a TON of SpongeBob room decoration thing and baby/girl/boy clothes), then Andrea (end table set), then me, then Katy, then Laurie. But we all sold something. And that's important :) We'll do better next week, though.
it seems like it's always left to me to say these things, the obvious
Though my heart is heavy, it is a heart that is also grateful. Over and over again these past few weeks a common topic has been presented to me from various unrelated sources besides the Bible itself. This entry is a bit of a reiteration of my previous entry… But, it is as if God really wants to make it clear to me right now that gratitude is the best defense against my fear and uncertainty. I surmise that it would be excusable, permissible, maybe even expected that I would be crippled with fear and blinded by uncertainty with everything we’ve been faced with. If you’d have asked me how I thought I’d respond to this situation prior to actually being in it, I would have imagined just that. Initially, that was the direction I was headed. God lovingly put his arms around me (because I allowed Him to) and steered me in the opposite direction. As he veered me off the wretched path of hopelessness and armed me with this message of gratitude, I’ve discovered this alternative way of dealing with life’s struggles instead of following my own human nature. While the outcome of Nora’s prognosis is literally uncertain, God’s love for me, God’s love for my family, including Nora is most definitely certain. He already knows the final outcome. I praise Him for whatever that is because I am confident in His will.
Therefore, to announce that religious organisations will no longer be restricted is, in some small way, a success for the campaign to denationalise conscience. And so long as Harriet Harman's bill doesn't get drafted in to make what is permitted into what is required, we can hold onto one small area where conscience is private and free, rather than public and bound.
2. A skinny refrigerator is like a skinny baker. Un-trust-worthy. Think about it, if a baker is skinny then he/she is not eating what he/she bakes. That gives me pause.
I've decided the only positive spin I can put on the beginning of the year is that perhaps I will sweat off some weight. Perhaps.
Or hickory bull in milky grass
So the question in my mind is how do we maintain well-funded competitive and state of the art universities while still allowing them to be accessible? I don’t believe the answer is simply making them free or freezing tuition rates. Making universities entirely dependent on government (i.e. tax-payer) funds will put our institutions at a competitive disadvantage since their ability to generate revenue will depend on the fluctuations inherent in the ups and downs of the economy as well as the ideological bend of the government of the day. In addition, there are lots of wealthy people out there who can more than afford public education: why in the end would we want to subsidize everyone equally when some have needs and some don’t? Surely a better strategy is to target those with the most needs with the most subsidy? Doing so then allows for you to elevate more of the have-nots by tipping the scale away from the haves who would otherwise benefit equally as the lesser offs.
I am so happy I was able to see family today that came in from Alabama. My cousin John, his girlfriend, Julie and her two boys. It was nice to go and visit with my Aunt and Uncle and spend time with them. I didn't realize how long it had been since I had visited their house and hung out. I need to do that more often. I think the realization hit me when I seen the beautiful changes they had made to their house and it had been that way for a little bit. Therefore, I need to visit more often.
He got to stop by the office today to say hello to everyone. I wasn't thinking and didn't get pictures, oh well, maybe I'll remember next time.
they take…I take…
- I wont be able to give CCB any crazy guy fodder for her entertainment purposes
One of the major difficulties the Owls faced in this game is the absence of many key players through suspension or injury, including the captain Rob Jones. Although manager Gary Megson had signed 6 on loan players, only 5 of them could be included in the game. Arsenal forward Sanchez Watt had to be excluded from the match.
We now need 80-90% of existing broadband users to switch to our Community Interest Company Communications project. People new to broadband will be very welcome to join too, of course.
THING 1 STILL NEEDS YOUR VOTE
58. Take a trip to the hobby store – pick out a project to work on for the afternoon
(No Snapshot Avalible) AMF Bowling
Important improvement to the old model is that with the new model you can use macro function in 200-300 range. That helps a lot, having used the old model for years and cursing not being able to zoom at all but myself and the camera instead. Take a look at the zoomed macro example shot of my Crassula-family plant below.
Even the darkness cannot disarm us
Gifts included the first two seasons of Supernatural (yay!), and the newest CD from Rise Against. Plus some money put towards the aforementioned week long gathering, for which I leave tomorrow!
One by one, my kids woke up.
Follow us on the blog: StopAndScrap blog, and leave a comment on this blog. Leave comments on all the blogs above for more opportunities to win.
Now I have to tell you that several of us will be leaving Sketch Saturday including myself......
Member State and who are or have been subject to the legislation of one or more
It’s been clear to me – no matter what kind of doctor I see – that the physician is very carefully watching the amount of time spent with me. Other patients I’ve spoken with about this have agreed: our beleaguered physicians have only so much time for each patient. I would suggest keeping that in mind as you read the excerpt.
Cautiously bring to a rolling boil, stirring until potatoes are near done, then add:
The holy Qu’ran was reveleaed on Prophed Mohammad -last Prophet Muhammed Sallahu Alaihi Wasallam).
Three miles from the farm down more interestingly mother nature carved roads are the cacao fields. Cyrila’s Chocolate owns 60 acres of jungle with 5 acres used for cacao. When we arrived at the cacao field, Juan proceeded to explain the 3 main types of cacao pods that are in production. He picked a pod from a tree, and against a second pod picked by myself, he smacked them together to open one. Cacao does not end up the way it starts and the way it looks is so completely different from what you would expect. Juan encouraged me to sample one of the beans from inside the pods. All I can say is interesting. Doesn’t taste much like chocolate at all. There is a white milky substance surrounding each bean and this substance has a citrusy, or mango-like flavour. Not chocolate at all. The cacao beans are approximately the size of an almond. After sucking on the cacao bean Juan encouraged me to bite it. Again, the bean doesn’t taste like chocolate at all. It is obviously the manufacturing process of fermenting, and roasting the beans that produces the flavour we have come to know and love.
My school offers weekly two-hour evening classes, and in the two classes so far we have covered the basics of ‘What’s your name?’ ‘What’s your surname?’ ‘I’m English. And you?’ ‘I’m a teacher/student.’ I am one of two students, and we have a native speaker teacher, who also speaks English. Outside class, I thought I should practice what I preach and find some extra things to help me study, in addition to the materials our teacher gives us. I have started compiling a list of the resources I’ve found, and if anyone has any others to recommend, please let me know. My three favourites are currently:
Her sense of reality had been challenged enough for a lifetime she thought. But still she found herself crawling through this hidden passage with her bundle of papers held tightly to her chest. Somehow she new this was where she had to go. The passage went on for a few hundred meters before opening up to a courtyard.
885 *D-IX/1/1984. “The Fundamental Alternatives for Leo Strauss.” Clarement Institute for the Study of Statesmanship Panel, Annual Convention, American Political Science Association, Washington, D.C. (Incorporated in Item C-2002(1), pp. 171-76.)
I would really love to tape tutorials and post them in video format too.... we shall see if I can get a camera set up, and find time to learn how to edit video.
One thing that happened with me, just about 10 hours after I started the thought experiment, was that I realized I found the obsession boring. You know, the obsession with solving the problem of my pain and making it go away. I started asking myself, “Why do I care about this so much?”
I thought I'd get a little more writing in today too.
According to General Instruction of the Roman Missal #160: When receiving Holy Communion, the communicant bows his or her head before the Sacrament as a gesture of reverence and receives the Body of the Lord from the minister. The consecrated host may be received either on the tongue or in the hand, at the discretion of each communicant. When Holy Communion is received under both kinds, the sign of reverence is also made before receiving the Precious Blood.
And get this my lovely ladies - during the 1st Sex and the City movie my boyfriend was @ the set! - YES I KNOW, right?! - i HAVE THE ROSES from when Carrie was hitting Big with them when he shows up late to the wedding! - YES I HAVE THEM! - ****ekkkk**** it's my little slice of heaven right there! .. i REALLY need to work in NYC so i can meet and greet all these celebs - Joe meets them ALL and has actual conversations with these people! ((lucky sucker))
Each day after taking the children to school I came home and tidied up. As I worked, I watched the men renovating the house opposite and Kathy standing at her gate waiting for her daughter-in-law. If it was raining she wore a transparent plastic headscarf dotted with yellow flowers. And at around 11 o’clock, the old man walked his dog.
* Science Teachers
half part elderflower cordial
Litigiousness adds another element. It has become regrettably common for those injured in minor accidents to sue, and for responsible authorities such as councils to seek to eliminate the possibility of injury. The fear of risk not only deprives the public of valuable amenities such as children’s playgrounds, but also reinforces the message that the public realm is a risky place, and best avoided.
Hey! Welcome to all my new readers or followers. If any of you are new moms or know a new mom, then be sure to enter the Ruby Red Handmade onesie giveaway. That little darling will look so cute in one of those.
Lying on the River Tavy and on the edge of the Dartmoor National Park,
Then the endocrinologist confirmed the recommendation that I take these, to promote female secondary sex characteristics. And I have just carried on taking them. One pharmacist decided to warn me that mine was a particularly high dose for HRT, but then, I am not taking HRT: it is very similar, but I think the differences are important. I am taking oestradiol as a treatment for transsexualism syndrome.
From the fountains of your lips
The winds of Thor are blowing cold
I cut fresh white corn off the cob. Some olive oil is heated in a pan and the corn and fava beans are heated through. I threw in some walnuts at the last minute. Season to your liking!
Today there is no evidence of a single concentration camp built by the Apartheid government. There are no mass graves and not a single person has ever been found guilty for the so called “Crime of Apartheid”.
He spoke in a voice that sounded like frying meat, ‘Eat.’
The Small Back Room – 3
This is an easy technique. It doesn't matter too much what paper you use, as long as it's cardstock. Start by loosely coloring with a few colors. You don't have to stay in the lines or anything, you're just getting some color down on the page.
14. Sequence 14 (01:22)
And I haven’t even scratched the fucking surface. His style, for whatever reason, harkens back to the melodramatic noirs of the late thirties and forties. Maddin’s voiceover is a mixture of Werner-Herzogian hilarity, peppered with misplaced metaphors and thoughts so deep, you’d need James Cameron to excavate the bottom. (Side note movie idea: James Cameron as a ‘thought diver’. He uses an Inception-like submarine to dive into your darkest dreams and nightmares…and once he gets there he calls you a ‘pussy’ and makes a billion dollars. How? Don’t ask. He’s James Fucking Cameron.) And between the eyeball-battering flashes of disconnected flotsam and jetsam, Maddin breaks in with title cards screaming subtext through your entire body. There’s no time to process or argue, you just have to wait, thinking, “Wait…wait… did that just say boobs? Guys…why did it say boobs? Guys…?”
Kim Newman – Pastor Pat At The 700 Club
Do you remember those Special K commercials? Those ads have haunted me for years and I've been skinny most of my life. I can't imagine how they affected people who weren't thin. Even now, I'm in excellent shape, not from dieting, but from exercise and eating real food, but I can still "pinch an inch". On both sides. At the same time.
How glorious it would be if before these buggers began
Every year in the ruins of what was once North America, the evil Capitol of the nation of Panem forces each of its twelve districts to send a teenage boy and girl to compete in the Hunger Games. A twisted punishment for a past uprising and an ongoing government intimidation tactic, The Hunger Games are a nationally televised event in which "Tributes" must fight with one another until one survivor remains.
* That latter definition sounds a lot like what we now mean by
Sometimes I plan what I want to achieve before I even start the creation process. I might have a theme in mind, an idea that has been buzzing around in my head, or I may have an item, treasured trinket or photograph that is inspiring me to get to work. Once I have a rough idea of what I want the piece to be about I usually start to gather together the elements that I feel might work. Once I have all of these things in place, I start. However for this particular piece things didn't work like this at all. I had been having trouble getting the ideas from my head into action and I was getting frustrated at not being able to make some sort of sense of my thoughts, thus resulting in a creativity blockage. After a few feeble attempts at trying to get something started and having no luck, the solution to my creativity blockage was...
1. Heat the oil in a medium-sized pot. Add the chopped white parts of the green onion or the onion and saute until they’re soft – about 3-4 minutes. Then add the garlic and ginger and saute for another minute or two making sure not to burn the garlic.
"It's really not my favorite."
We are planning to move in together after the holidays and planning a vacation for the spring... I can't wait because there is no other guy I've been with that has made me feel so wonderful. I'm at my place and he's at his right now...I miss him tonight but I know tomorrow when I fall asleep next to him he'll hold me a lil bit tighter because he missed me too. Can't wait...
In Chicago, Mayor Emanuel has rapidly emerged as a model local Chief Executive for best-practices in urban food policy. The lessons of Let's Move! were well learned by Emanuel during his time at the White House, and he continues to get guidance from his former colleagues, according to Kass.
up to where the pink stops and the black begins is where Dad's clothes overflow starts - obviously where I get my hoarding habits from
Then I added chicken. I added both chicken breasts and the chicken thighs that were such a great deal, and ended up with 7 pieces of chicken to put in the crockpot, which was perfect, because I was having my aunt, uncle, and cousins over for dinner, and there was going to be six of us:
So, the most popular music style in Thailand comes form the North Eastern region of Thailand and is called: Yeah. You guessed it. ‘Isan’. It is home to over half of the entire population with a massive 45 million plus inhabitants. The region is also the poorest.
Do I think the President could do a better job? Do I think that the people in the White House should be smarter than allowing themselves to be duped by the noise machine at Fox news? Of course I do, but that doesn't mean that I'm ready to jump ship. I live in the real world. Anyone want to join me?
So I finally spoke up that the person can't breathe in; the pressure in the lungs is already equalized by the open wound and the lung is probably collapsed. Professor nodded and asked the class what this is called.
upon a set of English Scenery in red at a yard sale.
Lickin' Dickens
I just gave him a light kiss on his lips and took off.
We're having a great time!
At the age of seventeen I met with an accident which caused me much suffering, and came nearly ending my life. I was riding a very ill-tempered horse, which, while going down a very steep, rocky hill, suddenly leaped from the road and ran down the steepest part of the hill, going at full speed amid the thickest of the rocks. At the same time, he commenced kicking, and was about to land me over his head among the rocks, but I lodged on the top of his head, and grabbed each of his ears with my hands, expecting every moment to be dashed to pieces against the rocks. While in this position, sitting astride the horse’s neck, with neither briddle nor other means of guiding him except his ears, he plunged down the hill among the rocks with great fury, until he struck a rock nearly breast high, which threw him to the earth. I went over his head, landing squarely upon my feet almost one rod in front of the horse. Alighting upon my feet was probably the means of saving my life; for if I had struck the ground upon any other part of my body, it would probably have killed me instantly. As it was, one of my legs was broken in two places, and both my ankles put out of place in a shocking manner. The horse almost rolled over me in his struggles to get up. My uncle saw me, and came to my assistance. I was carried to his house in an armchair. I lay from 2 o’clock in the afternoon until 10 o’ clock at night without medical aid and in great pain, when my fathef arrived with Dr. Swift, of Farmington. The doctor set my bones, boxed up my limbs, and that night conveyed me eight miles in his carriage to my father’s house. I had good attention, and although my sufferings were great, in eight weeks I was out upon my crutches, and was soon restored to a sound condition.”
Retro Stefson
This is how it spreads out, this is how it's going to spread out, and this
【sgt.】is very active on the live circuit and even run their own semi-regular event called “seimei” which brings together the best in the Japanese indies scene. Bands like 54-71, good music, OVUM, win a sheep free, The World Heritage, and other bands have graced the event with their presence. In 2005, they released their first mini-album, “perception of casualty” with the help of the engineering skills of one of Toe’s members. Sgt. then released a split with good music the following year. Their newest release, Stylus Fantasticus was released in 2008 internationally by HearJapan.
At some time at the end of 2010, approximately within the same month these things happened.
BeeCute reserves the right to change any rules if deemed necessary without prior notice.
Ooi also said eight pastors had been called by the police to have their statements recorded over the meeting.
We work ourselves into Victorian lathers,
That’s just the start of the swag. It seems like everyone was giving away something or promoting something. (I admit I have every single piece of Human Target merch.) Keep your eyes open, as a lot of SDCC exclusives will be released to regular retail in the coming months. What was your favorite piece that you took home from the convention? Let me know below.
The chapters of SHATTER ME are very short, between five to ten pages each. I literally flew through the story. It’s no wonder, considering that we’re given the electrifying start into the story with a girl, our protagonist, locked up in a cell. The very first thing we get to read about are Juliette’s feelings or her lack thereof since she has been locked up for quite a while. To keep her thoughts together, she writes in a notebook. She uses a lot of numbers to keep a hold of things and it’s quite fascinating to be so close to her very thoughts, primarily supported
FOOTNOTE 8: It is worth noting that, because the proposed complaint alleges stand-alone violations of Section 5 rather than violations of Section 5 that are premised on violations of the Sherman Act, this action is not likely to lead to well-founded treble damage antitrust claims in federal court. See Herbert Hovenkamp, Federal Antitrust Policy at 588 (2d ed. 1999).
KZN police spokesman, Captain Thulani Zwane, confirmed the incident and
Now available as a free PDF download, Blackfriars is a tale of Vampires versus Vikings written and drawn by Michael Crouch, the man behind Storm Comics - and drawn in the style of a serial from the classic British Scream! comic.
2. For night makeup, go for darker eyeshadows. Glossy lips are also great for girls' night outs.
RR—Yeah, certainly. It’s part of reality. I think it is possible to get it back, and I think to some extent all this paranormal phenomena is like—it’s what I call the “cultural sleep deprivation.” If you’re a human being, if you’re sleep-deprived, you go nuts. If your mind has no access to the deep subconscious like in the dream state, what happens is you become neurotic, and that starts coming into your conscious experience and you have hallucinations and you go nuts. Well, I think the same thing can happen on a cultural level. We have a culture that is basically trained to cut us off from this deep unconscious level of the psyche, of the spirit, and as a result, our culture has gone mad.
I've slowed down to about one post a week, but it's a pace I'm really comfortable with right now and I couldn't imagine not having this blog to post on at all!
New Holland Cabin Fever
bloodshed, compassion, trust and forgiveness. It is Frazier's ability to bring
So I just finished reading Eaarth (read it!) and my motivation to eat locally, conserve water, and conserve energy has been given a bit of a kick. (Sidenote: I've been blogging a lot less lately simply because I'm tired with this pregnancy...and my kids have turned a bit psycho on me).
The giveaway will start today and go through April 31st and then on May 1st I will announce the winner. Give it a try, see what you think. ENJOY!!!
Mr. Nicholson talked about the perfection of a beach as a drawing surface, how the horizon is wide and can be used to set horizontal lines, how a penny can be dropped in the sand as a radius to the center of the earth. “On the beach you have, natively, the axis to the world,” he said. And, it suddenly felt very momentous standing there in one of my favorite places.
How do we pay tribute to the pain we have endured?
it’s called …. SCRABBLE!!
my thumb in the shallow petal of your temple.
You’re not a leper.
This sounds like grade five antics but we were all afraid of fucking up our visas just because we don't know enough French. And when it comes to visas, everyone gets a little tense.
After returning from my classes on Sunday night, I slid right into a crazy week of school activities, work and babysitting children for a friend of mine who just gave birth to my new Godson. He's so yummy!
This thing wasn't a muzzle, it looked more like something they would put on the Jack Russel terrier version on Hannibal Lecture and all the Vet said was "This might be a little tight". My dog is a Pitt-Bull Lab mix with a big block head, there was no way in hell that this little gimp mask was fitting over his snout. And then this Vet went for another blow, he told ME to put it on. I know my dog, we have tried muzzles before and we have major difficulty trying to get on ones that actually fit, lets not even go into that this thing was two sizes too small. And as I'm struggling to try and get this thing on, I have Cesar Millan standing in the corner saying "Sit, No, Stay, Bad". Obviously we could get this dam thing on. It was impossible, it wasn't like it was my fault. The asshat gave me the wrong equipment. But then the vet went over the line. He then refused to try and actually look at the dog because we could get the muzzle on, however still gave us a shit ton of meds for what he THOUGHT the problem was and sent us out of the office.
whew, Is It getting HOT in here?
Kate has found her calling. The camera loves her, she SHINES! So, if she can pair her passion with providing for her family while staying grounded and being "Mom" to eight awesome kiddos, then more power to her!
How can we expect Him to do His work in us if we don’t claim His sovereignty in us? That is why we have this in Ephesians 6:10. “Finally, my brethren, be strong in the Lord, and in the power of his might.” Notice that the strength is in the Lord.
Our eldest artist, the highly esteemed David Martin RSW RGI. This is Mandolin and Pears and I am always delighted that he gives me small works for our annual Affordable Art Show. He's a very busy man . . . .
The Votes are in and the Top Three are:
19 Rumble
Soon after that, another house mate had strep throat, but I didn’t get it.
6) Opera Lover's Cookbook ~ I'm thinking a special dessert for dinner since all my guys will be home tonight
Here is another series I've started, called Deadly Space.
1/2 small onion (finely chopped)
Remember the first time you "discovered" the music of one of your favorite bands? Hearing those magical notes for the first time, those lyrics that seemed to speak directly to you that made you feel like you weren't alone in your experiences, that other people understood and they'd even had the courtesy to put their feelings and YOURS to music?
Much, much more than I wanted to feel.
Silver Embossing Ink - Craft Smart
On Thursday, a rather large group of birders formed a caravan and headed out first to Manzano Pond, which has in the past been good for migrating birds about this time of year. Although migration seems to be a little slow this year, we would see some pretty good birds there that morning . One of the first we’d spot were several Red-naped Sapsuckers, one of which was nesting in a tree cavity on the far side of the pond and a couple of others playing hide-and-seek in a dense tree. Eventually, however, they would pop out in the open long enough to be photographed.
Jesus has chosen us, appointed us, to be His body – to represent Him here on earth, to do His will, to reach out in love, to be shepherds, to defeat the enemy. The significance of the staff cannot be over-emphasized.
While clearing out a few boxes, I found a few more paperweight blanks. I thought I had used all of them but since I had them handy, and a few of you have written asking when I'd be listing more.... I made a trio of them! They are $30 each plus shipping.
Three said they did know or were told before signing, while one said they were told after giving their signature.
1931 -”I’m All Dressed Up With A Broken Heart”
Po approaches the counter and sets a sixer of IPA's thereupon.
Let's put another few of Matilda's stereotyped and stunted feature actors in perspective here. Clive Revill: The Assassination Bureau and Avanti!. Harry Guardino: Houseboat and Dirty Harry. Lionel Stander: Mr. Deeds Goes To Town and Once Upon A Time In The West. Robert Mitchum: Night Of The Hunter and Cape Fear (both versions). Lenny Montana: The Godfather and Fingers. Art Metrano: They Shoot Horses Don't They? and How Stella Got Her Groove Back. Roy Clark: ...uh... well, "Hee-Haw" and "The Beverly Hillbillies".
Heck even Ben Bernanke and others have issued warnings that Europe could drag down the US banking system if it crumbles.
I was once asked, in response to my announced intention to do a parachute jump, “Are you sure that’s wise?” Now, perhaps I was a little more condescending in my response than the situation warranted, but it seems to me that wisdom has very little to do with leaving the relative safety of a perfectly serviceable aircraft while it is still 3,500ft from the ground; with nothing to slow your extremely rapid descent but a large piece of nylon, held up with lots of string. In fact… I would go so far as to say that parachuting from a plane which is neither on fire, nor full of extremely venomous and extremely pissed off cobras is actually a little extravagant.
7. Foreigners can invest in this country, but it must be an amount at least equal to 40,000 times the daily minimum wage.
Rob takes us into a dark dank little pub right near Victoria Station and orders a round of tequila shots.
You can find the forgotten little-seen cemetery on the grounds of the Cheeca Lodge at Mile Marker 82 on the left side of US-1 South. Stop at the main gate and simply ask for a visitor pass to see the Pioneer Beach Cemetery. It’s FREE to both park & visit the hallowed ground.
Some writers also go so far as to include reams of description of food and clothing, which is nice, but I don't necessarily do that. On occasion I will mention a nice kidney pie, or a glass of port, but I know how I feel when I read something that contains four paragraphs of what was on the dinner table. To me, that just takes away from the reading of the book. And I don't necessarily care that the morning gown the heroine wore was made of yards of imported silk, capped with an organza overlay with enbroidered flowers around the hem and neckline. I'd rather just know the color. But that's just me.
All these values are important to me and life just dosen't "click" for me if one of them isn't quite right or I am having troubles with one.
Be sure to email me your goals for the week. If you do not know what to work on, please ask me.
Nicholai's imagination was galvanized by the concept of shibumi. No other ideal had ever touched him so. "How does one achieve this shibumi, sir?"
Once upon a time, this beautiful studio was just a brown, run-down hunting cabin. The windows were small and strictly utilitarian; the interior was rugged and plain. Today it is a fantasy retreat filled with candles, lace and chandeliers.
The campaign manager for Democratic Court of Criminal Appeals candidate Keith Hampton emailed me to ask if I would republish this blog post from Burnt Orange Report by Keith titled "My Recommendations for the Forensic Science Commission." Here's what he wrote:
Do we dare tread the murky waters of the addiction stream today? No, although the addiction you have to injuring yourself is eerily similar to the release of your emotions. Unlike talking to a friend, a running partner or your spouse about aggression, fear and self hate. The tools you employ in injuring yourself while running, lifting and engaging in Extreme Fitness routines give the reliable and predictable response you desire. Your actions cannot fail you in the same ways the people in your life can.
Papers from Basic Grey 'Life of the party' and the background papers are a printable download from 'Doodle Pantry' a birthday gift from Michelle - Pink Paper Paradise thanks Michelle...
1. If we don’t answer we won’t run the risk of being a fool, but if we do answer we will prevent the fool from thinking he is smart
"Time for your hand jive, Mr Lupin."
In addition, by shutting the site down and arguing that all data can be destroyed, the authorities are destroying evidence and ignoring the constitutional rights of the millions of US citizens who stored data on Megaupload.
Sou'-West by South-and South by West-
1. What was your all-time favorite movie?
“Me too,” said the baker.
I consider this one a rough draft. I plan on playing around on the website to see if I can get all the blue colors to match exactly. I'd like more of a variety of fat and skinny lines, too. And maybe even a different font.
What Galileo had actually done by pointing his telescopes to the sky, discovering craters on the Moon, the moons of Jupiter and sunspots, was to put an end to the classical belief that the heavens are perfect and unchanging and that only the Earth is subject to change. He had also defended the theory of Copernicus, now long dead, a theory that was not even his own but one which he endorsed because he believed it to be true.
From this we see a perfect example of the joy of walking in obedience to the gospel of the grace of God. Were he to remain and do the Lord’s work his own way could he claim the blessings from Him? I think not. Were he to remind his listeners of how evil he was in his unsaved state would they turn to Christ? Again, I don’t think so for they would see that he was no better than they.
But wait! There's more! I also received a copy of The Best Science Fiction and Fantasy of the Year Volume Six edited by Jonathan Strahan. Which includes my short story "The Dala Horse" along with some twenty-nine others..
I have concluded that Comcast enlists the help of "Fembots" to do their customer support. I do not know if we actually have signed up for cable again or not. I don't know if we added "Showtime" or not.
I'm guessing that the filmmakers wanted to create a camp classic with Whisperer, but this isn't entertaining enough to classify as camp. It is instead pompous, poorly executed and lacking in any wit whatsoever. As I had to review this, I watched the entire film, but believe me, there's nothing worth sticking around for- this is a truly bad film.
"I've seen quite a few changes on how to control weight and it's starting to get confusing to me. First it was calories intake, then it was carbs, and now I keep hearing about acidic food and balancing the PH. What is all that?"
So, in the spirit of going back to poetry's roots, the Poetry Seven are at it again with a pickup game of renku. Liz and Andi threw us the idea a week ago, and presto! by today, we have something that weaves and jinks and laces us all together. We have a game. Play with us.
Participants: TBD
amissible adj; liable to be lost. This applies to almost anything Daughter owns. Or Son, come to that. We are a family full of amissibility.
For a band that a lot of people know little to nothing about, Sopwith Camel had a pretty promising start. They were only the second San Francisco band to be signed to a major label (the 1st being Jefferson Airplane) and the first San Francisco band to have a top 40 hit with Hello, Hello in January 1967. That was as far as their luck went. Unable to repeat the success of the single in album sales or further singles and they broke up soon after. They reformed in 1971 and recorded their 2nd album (with the title that's too long for me to type over again) released in 1973. Where the first album was simple vaudevillian style psych, where this second outing is hazy progressive inflected psychedelic rock.
Do you have any idea of the waste of time and effort this represents? I could have saved us a lot of time and aggravation by just buying the bagels at the store, ripping the bag open and throwing them on the floor before I left the store, at least they would have done the clean up part. Or I could have saved even more work by simply throwing the money on the ground before I entered the store.
a theme
Once you have that number, you need to track down a website that will print the book for you. Plenty of different places exist to make your book, so do a little shopping to find the best price for what type of book you want. Some places even give you a discount if you get the ISBN through them. Other differences between companies include quality, time of delivery, and quantity. Places like booksjustbooks.com and selfpublishing.com provide a good place to start researching basics and details of purchases.
January 2010.
The king’s heart is a stream of water in the hand of the LORD; he turns it wherever he will.
PREHEAT oven to 450F
Several months ago I began house hunting. This was no small task. Two dogs are a challenge; a travel trailer certainly ups that challenge. As does my unwillingness to be told what color to paint my front door or what to plant in my yard, so there goes townhomes and condos. And I am entirely too loud and non-conforming to ever live in a formal neighborhood. As it turns out, only about 5% of rentals allow dogs, so once you water those down with my additional needs, it left about two houses out of 150 that were options. And because only 5% welcome dogs, there is a mad rush to secure those homes. It’s exhausting even typing it. I won’t even get started on my rant about how society wants you to rescue a dog, but then no one wants you to live on their property!
Scream as cat jumps from top of fridge onto your head. Try to sooth her so she does not rip out anymore hair. Get on the ground hoping she will get bored and let go on her own.
When are we going to acknowledge that women can do push ups or chin ups just as well or just as badly as men, we may not enjoy them (that’s me, I confess I think push ups are an evil creation but they are effective and I still love it when guys expect me to do it on my knees and I don’t!) but there is no reason why we cannot do them.
Thanks for dropping in today and sharing in my boys special birthday card. Have a wonderful day.
10th April- The Earl, Sheffield, UK (with Stubb, Trippy Wicked, Groan)
It is deplorable to know how the US State Department is heavily involved in funding the journalists in Pakistan to give prominence to their own vested agenda. The US is making investment in Pakistani journalists to side with it in this fourth generation warfare. In this kind of war, journalists are very important soldiers and their reports are effective weapons.
I have still struggled some with food this week. Not sure WHAT the heck my problem is, but I am hoping that I begin to see everyone's results with this challenge that I will shape the heck up!!
“Well that’s not exactly true now is it…” insists Moskk who is actually smiling a bit now, as his eyes go from foggy, to silver.
She holds to hers my static heart,
This lack of resources due to poor economic conditions made it a common thing for people to join the military. The military provided one with more rations for daily necessities, including fabric. Such rations that the military received, in terms of clothing, were also higher quality than those of regular citizens. The high perception of the military was perpetuated by the quality of fabrics and Zhongshan suits. It is possible that this high perception of the military subconsciously encouraged the usage of the Zhongshan suits.
As with Jackson's story, the plot has to do with an individual anonymously sending hateful gossip to all and sundry in town in order to satisfy what can only be a nefarious purpose. The crucial difference between the story and the film, however, is that the audience knows from the outset who the culprit is in the former but only finds out at the very end of the film.
The other important piece of takeaway information was that law enforcement is always looking to create a triangle, connecting the victim, the suspect, and the crime scene.
O my God and Father! but shall I dare call you so, after having so much offended you? Being sensible of my unworthiness, I durst not do it, where it not for the precious Blood of your Son shed, which he will here offer for me. If my sins provoke your just anger, his Blood will move your compassion. If you are deaf to my sighs and tears, you will not be so to his Blood, which cries louder than that of Abel, not for punishment but pardon of my crimes. Besides I know you had rather be esteemed the Father of mercy than the God of vengeance; all which makes me hope that you will not reject a contrite and humble heart; especially when presented by your Son, who, as our High Priest, is going to immolate himself in favour of me; for his sake receive me again as your child. Say to the ear of my heart, “You are my child”, which words will give a new life, and breathe a better soul into me. Imprint in my heart and actions the character of a good child; and give me not only that which children use to want and Fathers bestow, but give me what the depth of my necessity requires, and the greatness of your goodness knows how to give. Change my heart into that temper which may please you most. Give me a humility as profound as the nothing from whence I came, or rather as deep as the abyss into which my sins have cast me. Renew in me your image which by sin I have defaced, and destroy all that is offensive in me, and make me what I ought to be, for to be your worthy child. Let neither pleasure, fear, nor force startle me from my duty, or make me offend you.
Criner's liberation opened the door for the dozens of DNA exonerations the state has witnessed since, but because Governor Bush pardoned Criner, the case didn't change much about the court's jurisprudence. Sharon Keller won the debate on the court, even if she lost it in the court of public opinion. She convinced a majority of CCA judges to side with her against Charlie Baird, but the following year the Legislature created the state's DNA testing statute in rebuke (Ch. 64 of the Code of Criminal Procedure). When the courts upheld prosecutorial objections to DNA testing, the Legislature came back in 2011, at the recommendation of the Timothy Cole Advisory Panel on Wrongful Convictions and removed most grounds for opposing testing when the evidence could be probative.
And Don was as devoted to his dog as I have ever seen.
As Master Distiller Harlen Wheatley puts it, "aging barrels in different environments affects the taste of the whiskey. There has always been much discussion about warehouse placement, even among ourselves, so we're anxious to hear how others rate these bourbons."
Admittedly, there is nothing much that I can say about irregular verbs. If there was a set rule it would be easy. Alas, they are irregular and, therefore, don’t follow a rule— that’s the point! I would
The singer with a voice that could cut through steel, a brilliant but unstoppable (electric) guitarist and an instrument which could very well be a modern version of the kérôna I mentioned before creating a rhythmic wall to lean against.
The big day came.
One thing down, just a few more to go. Sorry about it being crooked. I had to use a bit of tape and snap the picture before it fell off my brick wall. LOL
And just in case you'd like to see a photo that screams flower, here's how I used a peony photo taken several years ago (read the how to's here) ...
“He’s having-” The woman giggled even more, Addison recognizing the flirty tone and getting very jealous. “-dinner right now.”
Some in the audience asked, “How does it work?”
UPDATE 211am CDT 4/25/2012:
We were, however, saddened to see that the resident tanuki statue had been turned away from the delicate eyes of the clientele. For those who do not know, tanuki statues are found in a lot of Japanese restaurants and they are representative of a creature that is said to be a kind of shape-shifter, and is a good luck deity for restaurants. It usually has a straw hat, a bottle of sake, and GINORMOUS TESTICLES:
Dynamics of Team Management (Team Diagnosis and Building Skills)
1 gasped
me, calling him darling at his cuteness and kind humor
It wasn’t a miracle that saved Jock Gavin, but it was pretty close. A semiretired hit man, commando, and jack-of-all-deadly-trades, he knows what Sophie is up against-and that she’ll need help. But the man he’s chosen for the job is an unpredictable as he is dangerous. Matt Royd is a wild card-hard, cool, merciless-and putting him into play changes the game completely. But to whose advantage?
I don’t want to ruin the ending but, it was a funny movie to watch. I would Highly Recommend it.
On that note, I know I have a TON of emails to respond to and will do my best in the coming days but am just trying to get my life organized while away from home.
So anyways, we had five people get baptized today. I guess more specifically, it was four kids and one adult. Even more specifically it was two kids, two teenagers, and an adult. But that doesn’t matter. It was cool that we had that many.
To hear a creature of the wood
So what is it? SINFUL COLORS Extra Shiny Lip Gloss! I only paid $3.00 for the tube and it is fantastic. It lasts forever and the shine is perfect. I purchased my tube from Walgreens. I would put the Sinful Colors lip gloss in the same category as Lancome's La Laque Fever which costs $26!
I send my soul through time and space
Wash and blanch the spinach leaves and puree it along with some corn so that it's really smooth.
How about you, dear reader? Do you have a preference of side? Does the person with whom you share a bed have a side preference, thereby relegating you to the other side by default? Do you sleep on a side when you're alone?
wrong candidate(s). Several mistakes are made,
In April 2010 Thula Borah released their first self-financed album, Mind River Matter, which was recorded by Andy Miller at Gargleblast Studios, Hamilton.
I don’t know that it’s truly a good thing to go through life avoiding passion, even if all passion leads to suffering (a staple belief of Stoics, as well as Cynics, Epicureans, Buddhism and many others, including some monotheists). Since I think you can change things, even if it’s only in a small way, I think a little suffering can be a good thing. Suffering can drive one to act, just as happiness and contentment can cause one to fall into a passive stupor.
For the above types of surgical flat wart removal methods you may be given numbing agents. You may have some discomforts both during and after the treatment. This will depend on various factors.
T.C. Marshall is a beautiful curmudgeon living in the Santa Cruz Mountains, chasing the seasons as they come to him, book by book. He pays the bills, accepts gifts, and teaches. Friend him on FaceBook to converse and to find out more.
I did it again. I changed my mind. After looking at the shop for a few days, I decided that using two colors on the exterior made it look even smaller. So I painted it all yellow. I can always add color later.
Posing as one of Robin Hood’s thieves to avoid the wrath of the evil Thief Taker Lord Gisbourne, Scarlet has kept her identity secret from all of Nottinghamshire. Only the Hood and his band know the truth: the agile thief posing as a whip of a boy is actually a fearless young woman with a secret past. Helping the people of Nottingham outwit the corrupt Sheriff of Nottingham could cost Scarlet her life as Gisbourne closes in.
But for now, I still stand waiting for my heart to gather faith to believe I can fly….Faith to cross this doorway…… Faith to take a leap of freedom…
Send me your passport number and the FPCC number and I'll give it to the Western Union man as soon as they open up tomorrow.
She was:
Isis cleared her throat. “I don’t know what Nigel has told you about us, but let me assure you, friends don’t do what he and I do.” Isis smiled coyly, waiting for a response from Rayna, but she offered nothing, not even a change in her facial expression.
2 strips bacon, cut into 1/4 inch pcs
I'm going walking today.
The aberration of philosophy is that, instead of seing in logic and the categories of reason means toward the adjustment of the world for utilitarian ends (basically, toward an expedient falsification), one believed one possessed in them the criterion of truth and reality. The "criterion of truth" was in fact merely the biological utility of such a system of systematic falsification; and since a species of animals knows of nothing more important than its own preservation, one might indeed be permitted to speak here of "truth." The naivete was to take an anthropocentric idiosyncrasy as the measure of things, as the rule for determining "real" and "unreal": in short, to make absolute something conditioned. And behold, suddenly the world fell apart into a "true" world and an "apparent" world: and precisely the world that man's reason had devised for him to live and settle in was discredited. Instead of employing the forms as a tool for making the world manageable and calculable, the madness of philosophers divined that in these categories is presented the concept of that world to which the one in which man lives does not correspond--The means were misunderstood as measures of value, even as a condemnation of their real intention--
to a black moon. The autistic part of my brain
at night we put our eyes in a case
Great. I remembered thinking to my self, Now I’ll never get off the mountain. I’ll have to find some place to stay for the night. Dumb snow.
“This is potentially a large financial budget of European funding for which Wales is eligible to make bids, and it’s important we get a substantial share of it.
Stay tuned for Phase 2
energy star back.
Thorn knew that this man was holding something back. He was still guarded
3 T capers
16 Home
For Almost The Same you worked together with Jelly Boy. How did you get him involved and what did he add to the production?
I cant wait to have another pumpkin carving party......that was our very first party in lubbock last year (its gonna have to be a tradition)
Supposedly only available at the brewery's tasting café and its two brew-pubs in Mons and Louvain-la-Neuve, but in all honesty I picked up my two bottles at a well-stocked Delhaize supermarket branch in Antwerpen for the price of 14 Euro each.
Because these two resolutions are inspired by liberal ideology which former popes described to us-that is to say, a religious license as understood and promoted by the Freemasons, the humanists, the modernists and the liberals.
A feisty beauty tempted by a bold Highlander’s touch…When a plane crash strands brilliant scientist Grace Sutter on an icy mountaintop in Maine, she finds herself alone in the wilderness with the only other surviving passenger — Greylen MacKeage,a sexy, medieval warrior who’s been tossed through time to find the woman he’s destined to love. Forced together to survive the harsh, wintry landscape, neither expects the fierce passion that flares between them. But Grace is not used to letting her heart take control, and Greylen will settle for nothing less than her heart’s surrender….
We talked about how to be generous with one another. About not turning every tiny frustrating event into World War 3. About how there’s never a good reason to haul of and punch your brother in the face…especially over the Bible!
edit: I got second place :)
THICKSET is an inclusive event. While it’s aimed at bearish folk and their admirers, you certainly don’t have to be either to attend.
We ended up eating at Noodle Box, which I was a little uncertain of. The last time I ate there, I had Pad Thai because Crystal told me it wasn’t that spicy (LIES) and ended up with an upset digestive system. However, I wasn’t sure if that was due more to the heat, the cooking method and other ingredients, or the bingsoo we had afterword. I’d intended to try Noodle Box again, but a different dish. This plan was for taking home, though, for obvious reasons. So I was taking a bit of a risk. All’s well that ends well, though, because I got Pho Xao and no problem. It was really good although they put waaaayyy too many bean sprouts in there – and I’m a lover of bean sprouts.
A comment on last week’s post “Illustration Friday—Swarm” asked if it was part of an alphabet project with the letter “B”. It wasn’t, but what a fun challenge, so today’s post is a sketch dedicated to “O” with the collective noun “tangle” as a verb and the only non-”O” word used… Busy, busy, busy!
Although, the main demographic of Pinterest users are women, between the ages of 25 and 44, there are increasing number of unique visitors to the social platform — 3.3 million users logged in and over 421 million page views in October to over 4 million users today.
Ale Street News, based in Maywood in Bergen County, has partnered with the 2-pint container's company, LeisurePak, for a US rollout of the Crafty Carton. Ale Street hopes its 20-year standing in the craft beer industry can put the containers on the radar of bars, restaurants, brewpubs and breweries as a convenience option for take-home draft beer.
image copyright AT&T
7. The films all have very good soundtracks.
– o zoetste aller zoete lusten –
* What is one thing you wish every beginner writer knew?
Looks like we all survived Elenin and can wish each other good morning yet again on our planet. This alleged event allows us to practice our highest spiritual discipline – that of discernment. Much was written about this event, which amounted to nothing and, yet, it very well could have. Learning to research, listen, explore possibilities and entertain them all without opinion, agenda or concern is the art of the seeker. Through it, we learn to empower ourselves by exploring and learning to trust our own judgment in the midst of rumor, innuendo and potential chaos.
St Etienne
The little boy nodded solemnly, then asked, "Why don't they wear clothes?"
This is what we have become
The Philobiblon – Richard de Bury
During the debate, three different views on illegal immigration had emerged. All the candidates agreed that building a stronger border fence was a surety of any serious immigration proposal. They disagreed, however, about what to do with an estimated 11 million undocumented immigrants currently in the country.”
Great idea number 9. Collect things that inspire you. Interesting images from the newspaper, a favourite but broken mug, the ice cream scoop that got ruined in the dishwasher(?), jugs, shoes…I don’t know what would be your choice but even though these days we are encouraged towards minimalism, collecting a few things that really make you want to pick up that pencil and draw, I’m sure would be fine to hold on to.
Amanpour: Jon I’m sure you don’t want to get
The event, organised by the Greater Manchester Muslim Police Association, was held at Sedgley Park police training school in Prestwich this week. Speeches outlining the significance of the religious festival and the contribution of Muslim officers to the police force were made before invited guests were asked to share in a traditional meal of dates followed by a selection of Asian dishes. Ramadan prayers were also observed.
Whenever I make an entire Thai feast I always like to start with these Thai Fishcakes served with a Cucumber Dipping Sauce that is refreshing and spicy at the same time! They are super easy to make (providing you have a food processor!) and always seem to be a hit, no matter who I serve them to. I love the contrasting crunch of the green beans with the soft fishcakes so I add a little more beans than you would normally expect, but if you like you can reduce the amount of beans a little.
traditional music. Madagascan music is so fantastically
Maximum Students: 10
I poopy.
The place of Ladakh would always be considered as a land not just full of stunning and panoramic views of nature but also packed with all the great monasteries. Their monasteries serve as proof that it is truly one mystic land which also marks the Himalayas and the plateaus of Tibet.
Oh wow, a really lovely dish that took me back to Singapore days! I think the only thing I'd change is to buy jumbo prawns instead of the large ones I got - but that's not essential.
Once and for all!
Many of the, what we would call, obstacles, whether they are people, cabal, the dark forces, Illuminati, military, political, monetary, social, religious, many of these have been cleared out before — and I am talking about even six months ago. Very often, if you were to go into your personal creation chamber, your sacred space, you would feel like you were maneuvering through a very dark, filled, antique store, where there is so much stuff that you can’t see anything, and it is dark and musty and dusty and very unpleasant.
For many, both continents must represent the ends of the Earth, the last truly great landmasses to be explored. I live in one and hope, one day, to see the other. Chance brought me here and I hope history does not rob me of the chance to see the other. But water is running on the white continent where it has never been seen before. The clock is ticking.
As we got to talking, I realized we had both been among a group of about nine or ten people who drove, 25 years ago, from Tucson to Mexicali, Baja California, to join 5,000 other bicyclists in riding 120 miles southward to San Felipe: the Mexicali–San Felipe ride sponsored by Monday International. A wonderful trip built on youthful enthusiasm, calloused bottoms, and strong quadriceps muscles. Great memories: a spectacular crash and road rash when I fell asleep on my bicycle and touched the wheel ahead in the paceline, a stop for roadside tacos at almost every house and stand on the return trip, a rural resort with delicious swimming pool the day after the ride, driving out on a concrete fishing pier to purchase diesel fuel for the return trip.
She had not noticed her broken heel and stumbled backwards again, grabbing his brown hair, and then his shoulder for balance.
Brother Maynard: Skip a bit, brother.
The Cupcake Bar
Dessert courses:
It was good in school today.
I had bought a Polaroid at a 2nd hand store, I loved cameras, and I took it with me. I went out early one morning and just stared out into the water for hours. I took this pic before leaving and it ended up being the only one I took with this camera as I had gone horseback riding later that day, fell off the horse and broke the camera. lol, so much for my new (almost new) camera. On the way home I remember deciding while looking at this pic that I was going to be a photographer.
In the New Testament when Peter and John were commanded by the Jewish authorities not to preach the Gospel they replied 'We must obey God rather than men' and went right on doing it (Acts 5:29). Many of the prophets and apostles and of course Jesus himself were killed precisely because they chose to obey God in what they said and did, in situations where his commands and those of human authorities conflicted.
a) Everyone pays a flat 8% Social Contribution tax.
Its zero.
~Bella
But yeah, it's high time I acknowledge my limitations and say that truthfully, this blog's heyday is over. I no longer have the time I had two years ago to lavish on this, posting drinks every night or…you know, once a month or something… but I'm not giving up on it, so don't worry about that. I'm just stating flat out that I just don't have the kind of time I used to that enabled me to go crazy with this thing. That being said, I still plan and hope to post new drinks periodically, and rest assured, I'm still reading a metric butt-load of material on cocktails and spirits and the like…I just don't get a chance to blog about it much. But I hope that doesn't mean we can't still be friends. And that you'll still stop by when I do have something new.
I have so many movies! Oh, I LOVE IT! ♥
07 Comin' Back Strong
Last year's winner, Patrick Ness, made a generous announcement speech after Julia Eccleshare had been through all the longlisted books, which was also nice for the authors there who hadn't quite made it to the shortlist.
It definitely wasn't the easy afternoon project I had envisioned, but I really like the way it turned out. But, for those of you considering this, here's the good, bad and the ugly details of using chalkboard paint under your counter. . .
and called the police, but they did not pitch for 45 minutes," the owner
PS. Special shoutout to Kelsey’s roomie, Hina, who is hilarious and told me I was the coolest person ever (false, btw, I’m not even slightly cool). We’re officially BFF’s now (before I was just unaware of our friendship haha)!
Matt picked up a bottle of Disaronno a couple of weeks ago and I sort of love it. It's a fruity amaretto with a bittersweet almond taste. I'm not always in the mood for a strong drink, sometimes I want something sweet. Plus, I love the almond flavor. It reminds me of bear claws on Saturday mornings at the bakery.
Marius Pretorius, 70, and his wife Lien, 68, were overpowered in their Vereeniging flat last week by three men armed with guns and knives.
After chopping these (about 1-in. cubes) I boiled them until I could easily stab them with a fork. It took about 20 minutes. I was left with these beauties and a pot of dark blue water….my daughter said it was ocean blue.
Though announced to the public at very short notice, brewers like Williams Bros, Black Isle, Tempest and others have been happy to help out by supplying beer. Indeed the Williams brothers themselves, Bruce and Scott, had turned up for the opening to launch their kegged Profanity Stout.
Materials : 2Hema
Homosexuality is a tough issue for many people, but how are we able to communicate a message that says It’s ok if you don’t like the homosexual lifestyle, but teaching parents to treat their children in a way that is in no way, shape or form, preached in the Bible! This type of behavior is NOT OK!!
—Porch Lies: Tales of Slicksters, Tricksters, and Other Wily Characters, by Patricia McKissack, with illustrations by Andre Carrilho—original trickster stories inspired by African-American folklore and other bits of Americana.
Today is Thursday - need a hint? That makes FIVE days that the hamper has been sitting empty by his bed when it's supposed to go in the closet here.
I have a big fear of sharing my long-term plans with anyone until I know for 100% sure they're going to happen. I think I'm afraid I'm going to jinx myself and end up looking like a failure if I change my mind or don't finish something. But sharing my plans also helps make them more real to me and allows people to offer help and advice. So here are some of the plans I've come up with for the next few years.
In both versions, an elderly woman named Kim Boggs tells us Edward’s story. In her youth, she was a normal girl, well liked and admired. She was a cheerleader and a member of the popular crowd. She dated a handsome jock. But what she thinks of later in life was not of any of these things but of Edward, an unconventional, immensely talented freak that was in love with her. Early in her life, he appeared to her as a prophet of beauty that she was not yet ready to handle, and that her simple, deplorable life was incapable of embracing.
to Saint Jo, turns her back on the east
Merci: Why borro(WED)?
Jonah's smile was even. He guessed it was best to be himself, but maybe his mother didn't even know that person.
I eliminated the pile of cut-outs that I had from several weeks ago.
Just a meadow ‘neath your feet?
What do you expect?
I call this my "1950s dad look". Pleated trousers and kiltied shoes, ha!
I want to be touched with passionate hands, with a sentimental kiss, with a sensual warmth. It’s unbearable, this yearning. I want to be loved by someone who will love me for me. I want to love someone as much as I loved him. I am afraid to love physically, for my tears will spill because of who I have loved physically and emotionally. When i love someone, I am afraid my love will not be there emotionally.
Heckert - (On if there are frustrations of not taking a receiver)- “No, there is not frustration. We could have taken a receiver. We don’t want to take a receiver just to take a receiver. No, there is not a frustration, we think that we got really good players. If we didn’t get a receiver and we didn’t get a good player we might be, but we are happy with the guys we took, we really are.”
Welcome to War, Children, and International Justice: The War Crimes Tribunal of the Hague. This site will be an invaluable tool to connect students and instructors on the course, travel information, and a place to share thoughts and photos.
Nothing at all, but rather, to watch through white wind
Semore Kurdi
Jared has cut caffeine completely out (he hasn't had any since Sunday which is pretty big for him) and he has cut down on red meat and processed foods. All three have been shown to have a negative impact (a small one) on calcium absorption or retention.
The only thing about the Master that is worth noting is that there is a new relationship with the series’ past that debuts here. The Master isn’t revealed until episode four, but the story parcels out clues in an almost matter-of-fact way prior to that. First is the revelation that the Melkur is in fact controlled by someone inside it (and that the interior is dimensionally problematic given the size of the Melkur, although given the frequency with which aliens in human suits are mis-sized this actually barely registers as a clue), then the revelations of a gaunt and disfigured man inside it, the existence of TARDIS-like roundels inside it, and the fact that it makes a TARDIS sound as it dematerializes all clue the end reveal, but none of this is particularly called attention to or flagged as a clue. It’s a relatively unhighlighted subtext for a more obsessive brand of fan that is likely to remember the fact that nearly eight years ago there was a regular Time Lord villain called the Master and that some four or five years ago the Master looked kind of like the guy in the Melkur statue does now.
I also added one can of white beans
I wish that I could be one of those people who play with radio-controlled boats at the weekend. Perhaps I'd belong to a local club and talk to fellow enthusiasts and every December we'd have our annual Christmas dinner, during which guest speakers would regale us with amusing anecdotes of exploding boats, lost signals and aggressive swans.
Her new single Falling Down features guest vocals from Khalaeliah who offers a nice balance ontop of Bratt’s flow. This track is full of emotion which is depicted well through the music video.
Beth Hubbard
I’m still working my way through the editing process for “Adventures Dark and Deep: A Curious Volume of Forgotten Lore,” Joe Bloch’s very cool ‘what if?’ re-imagining of Advanced Dungeons & Dragons as it might have been written by D&D co-creator Gary Gygax had he remained with the company (based on Gary’s public writings on the subject over decades). Naturally, that’s taking up a great deal of my free time, but I’m making good progress, and should be finished within another week or two. Then I can get back to Corporia (my dystopian utopia with a Cyberpunk-y/Shadowrun 0.5 feel), and hopefully wrap it up as Kickstarter beta by the first of June.
There is little to no bullshit present on these, their first two full-length releases--just an unrelenting onslaught of blasting drums, tremolo riffs, hoarse screeching about "Socerique Baphostorms", "Anal Madonnas", "Sodomythical Frostgoats", and "Hymnvocations of Nazarethian Nunwhores", and an abundance of seething, malevolent, diseased misanthropy. Oh, and some cool keyboard noises.
I accept full RESPONSIBILITY for both the successes and failures in my life.
What I say to end the conversation: Hmmm, maybe I will take a Yoga class or something.
If hop overload isn't your thing, I recommend you try Heretic's Evil Twin, a more maltier Imperial Red Ale I also liked. Either beer is great way to celebrate nailing 95 theses to a church door.
At any rate here goes. as I understand it Saddam had a pet project involving the recreation of Babylon, on the site of the original and in spring of 2004 we were lucky enough to do a walk through on the way back from another site. From what I understand it wasn't actually completed (and I have no idea what the current status is). Anyway I took these in spring of 2004.
“That’s it. That’s it, mate. You don’t get the fuck respect you fuck deserve.”
The whole beginning let me get into Gene's head and really appreciate how utterly horrifying life must be like for him. I don't think I could have done what he did. I had thought Cormac McCarthy's The Road was the ultimate literary example of Hell on Earth, but Gene's life in The Hunt might take the title.
The game is ruined when the campers are supposed to attack, because they never do. Maybe a handful of decent players will try to attack, but unless they’re really good most likely they won’t succeed on their own. If the attackers don’t attack then the game is ruined. Either the defenders will attack, pressing the attackers into their spawn points, or they will stay behind waiting for them. In both cases the round will end when the attackers will run out of tickets, and if they don’t attack this can take a very long time.
At the beginning of the Der Spiegel article there are six photographs of famous people when they were children, which can be used as a mini Before They Were Famous Test if you don’t scroll down too soon and see who they are. How many of them are you able to identify? I picked three of them correctly, and couldn’t guess at the others who were not unknown to me but weren’t hugely familiar either, as I’m not as European as the magazine is. I had seen the photo of the little boy with the big hat before and knew who it is. The thing that really struck me about this photo is the apparent abnormality with the child’s eyes. They don’t match – one is much darker than the other, which seems rather worrying. Some people naturally have irises of different colours, but it isn’t a good thing if pupil sizes don’t match.
On to quote number two.
